oh heres a brief change of tune, literally, Jack off Jill just came on the radio, i LOVE ‘American Made’ one of my all time favorite songs EVER…i can’t believe i’ve never performed this one (see below)…thats nice how uplifting a good riot girl rock number can really boost your mood lol, speaks to the bitch within lol. if you’re not familiar w/jack off jill, you should be…
3 attempts
We had some great weather in the Boston area this past weekend. Although it was a bit chilly in the mornings and there was a little wind, the temperatures were generally very pleasant to go along with sunshine.
So at full-moon they come to Erasmus,
Kate Donovan is burned out on work, worn down by her dating relationships, and in need of an adventure. When Kate's grandmother asks Kate to accompany her to Redbud, Pennsylvania, to restore the grand old house she grew up in, Kate jumps at the chance.
Harry E. Bovay, Jr.
Things:
3. Fine Line
It's not easy. I have to remind myself daily that 'God is good'. Satan is always there trying to make me believe otherwise...and he wants me to believe that it is the things of this world that matter.
3. Bray Wyatt
To be tested scared me. In ways I didn't want to know and yet so badly needed to. What I wanted was a kind of low risk gamble, and so I kept questioning Verity over and over, trying to get her response down to a suitable level. It was only when she told me that she thought I had less than a 1% chance of being infected did I like the odds and agree to take the test. Though I made it clear that if the test came back positive that all romance was dead and I'd kill myself that same day. And I meant it.
In the light of its frozen smile, pale as death,
MTV VJ, VegSocUK
Yeppers...I got Mooned Saturday night! I actually was able to get a decent shot of the moon with my newest camera addition, the Nikon P510! LOVE it! Saturday night, the moon was at it's nearest to Earth's orbit at 11:35pm...Hubby and I were in San Antonio visiting friends for the weekend when I heard about it and hoped I could stay up long enough to get a shot at it. I have NEVER been able to get a decent shot...until now. It was a Beautiful Moon...and it was bigger and brighter than usual...nice.
Total: 12 points
+ HICOUP – Ghetto Factory
Mickey Tussler, a young farm boy with Asperger’s Syndrome, was wonderfully portrayed by Luke Schroder. And Dean Cain was perfect as their Inspiring Coach Murphy, who believed in him and his abilities as a pitcher.
It’s limbs were disproportional to its body. Long skinny arms stuck out of a stumpy torso. His head was oblong with over sized eyes and slits where its nose and mouth should be. The thing walked out of view, and began making shuffling sounds. When it returned it placed its long spidery fingers on my eyelid holding it open, and with a long metal instrument began scraping my eyeball. I wanted to cringe away from the sound the instrument was making. I didn’t know what the purpose of the instrument was, all I could do was lay there listening to that awful scrapping sound wishing it would stop. As I watched him work my head began flooding with images so quickly my mind could hardly comprehend it all. I suddenly understood that he was trying to help us. They were scientist, studying our species.
On the second it will be a year since Little Poppet was taken from my body.
Excuse the terrible lighting in the photo. The blues and reds in real life are really vivid, bright colours. And yes, that is sewing that you see on my card...done by me...on a real sewing machine!! Mum has given me her old sewing machine. It has returned from being repaired and I am loving it! Expect to see some sewing on most of cards from now on! I did attempt to sew around the white circle but it was WAY more difficult to do than I imagined, so that little white circle (with it's crooked bits of sewing) has ended up in the bin. I think I'll stick with straight lines.
Wait, at this rate Ethan may be a co-producer at the age of 5.
During 2009, some 35 sex offenders on parole were arrested during compliance checks at six fairs throughout California for violating terms of their parole where GPS monitoring was conducted. Last year, five sex offenders were arrested for non-compliance after trying to enter the State Fair.
To win a copy of The Hanging Tree, just email your name and contact info to audrey@simonandschuster.ca with the subject line “Hanging Tree”. Contest expires August 30, 2010. *Canadian addresses only please.*
Low fat yogurt mixed with fresh fruit in a blender for a high-vitamin smoothie.
It is a rock on which Sarada Devi herself meditated.
These people are known for being extremely skilled in solving and creating puzzles, codes, and cryptograms in order to protect sensitive information both online and offline.
BURKE
Yeah, I think not. And we wouldn’t blame them for leaving. And yet, how would we scream if Jesus left us? Would we not say he was then unjust?
"I would be against trying to cram knowledge into the heads of children even if we could agree on what knowledge to cram and could be sure that it would not go out of date, even if we could be sure that, once crammed in, it would stay in. Even then, I would trust the child to direct his own learning. For it seems to me a fact that, in our struggle to make sense out of life, the things we most need to learn are the things we most want to learn."
Between the lake & the houses
Today was the day. We went to Kelowna. I forgot to bring the paper with the address. I couldn't remember the Dr's name. Maybe that was a sign... And when we found the office (I remembered the street and asked someone), the receptionist (who was wonderful!) said that there had been confusion and that our Doctor had said the appointment was cancelled... Perhaps another sign I should have heeded and gone home... Nevertheless, we went through with it and filled out the intake form.
A few years ago, I was honored to be invited by DH’s mom and sister to Black Friday shop with them. I think it was out of obligation, since they’d already invited DH’s brother’s girlfriend. And I wasn’t as excited once I realized they go to everything store, touch every thing in every store, and gladly wait hours in line.
The stairway is provided in three hinged sections. The uppermost is fixed to a trapdoor, being hinged to the frame and spring-biased towards it by means of folding metal support arms. When not required for use, the stairway is folded up and the metal arms force the folded stairway into a nesting position above the ope. The arms also act as a counterbalance when folding and unfolding the stairway.
'Another wonderful turn of events happened last week when I spoke with his new teacher for this upcoming school year. For the first time, he will have someone who knows that technology is the way to reach him, is knowledgeable about technology, and bought an iPad this summer so that she could be ready for him. We'll be sending his amazing MiP iPad with him to school so that we can coordinate apps. School starts Tuesday, and we can't wait to see where the year takes Jake. This year is pivotal for him since it is his last in elementary school.'
1. Appalling customer service. I was shuttled back between the front desk and the customer service desk, not told where the changing rooms or equipment was, asked for my mobile number three times (“I don’t have a local mobile”), and made to wait for 10 minutes whilst they registered my limited information for a day guest pass. I’d made reasonably clear that I wasn’t going to join and just wanted a transactional relationship with them – give me a pass, damnit! Eventually got in, having eaten into a short window of time I had for the workout.
And despite being busy today cleaning the inch of nicotine off our windows in preparation for some semblance of Spring sunshine (we live in hope), I have still found time to find a little suitable music to make the day seem better!
I covered his performances going in to the two national XC meets pretty thoroughly. Remember, I noted the runner who scared me most as a challenger was Edward Cheserek. The first of the two meets was the NXN in Portland. The course was extremely wet and muddy and about as sloppy of conditions one could expect going into race day. The main guys (Lukas, Cheserek, Lutz, Moussa, Rosa, Gedyon) went to the front early. Lukas made a decisive move about 3k or so in and that was the race. Simple enough. The chase pack was down to Cheserek and Lutz and honestly, there was no doubt. Cheserek did gain a bit of ground at the end, but to be fair Lukas was letting up as the win was in the bag and he had one more big one to go.
Its economic policies and infrastructure evolved in stages, distancing the country from its hard line, inward-looking, socialistic past. During this time, Hong Kong played a key role as China’s conduit for trade with the rest of the world, with manyHong Kong business houses moving their labour-intensive activities to the mainland because of cheaper labour and maintaining their base at home. It is said that the integration of Hong Kong with the Pearl River Delta in Guangdong was the most striking aspect of the trade and investment links between the two strategic partners.
The Dogs: Camping
Lord, make me salt.
And finally, Midge gets to stop being a hussy and wear a few more clothes.
The kitchen with stainless appliances and granite counter tops is a cook’s delight. Additionally there are custom built cabinets which afford an abundance of storage space. There is a gas range and there is a built in microwave. Adjoining the kitchen is a light filled breakfast room which is directly next to a formal dining room which would easily seat ten.
No one has said a word about the fact that no oil company has ever had to cap a deepwater well at such depths. Just consider how many ways BP has tried thus far.
So, I hope you’ll join me on this new journey that I’m about to start on. It should be a pretty wild ride.
Will there ever be a cure for the common cold?
Joel Stein is usually on the money with his satire. Not this time say many Indian-Americans, whom he targets in a satirical piece on immigration "My Own Private India", published in Time magazine this week.
ERIC OLTHWAITE: It were always raining in Denley Moor, except on days when it were fine; and there weren't many of those - not if you include drizzle as rain. And even if it weren't drizzling, it were overcast and there were a lot of moisture in the air. You'd come home as though it had been raining, even though there had been no evidence of precipitation in the rain gauge outside the town hall.
How did they find my blog? What that crap is this lame business ad/blog?
I know what you’re thinking – where are the girls? Well here’s one. Ditte Marie from Denmark singing Overflow, another bright upbeat dancy little number that came nowhere in Aalborg. It probably doesn’t examine the human condition in any great depth, but you can have too much philosophy. Wearing an ice queen leotard rummaged out of the seconds bin – check out the rips on her arms – she does a nice line in stage-strutting without it ever being over-the-top. It’s certainly jollier than the song that will represent Denmark this year. Have a listen.
In dialogue: "I can't believe it's almost time for the date. How has it been three days already?"
There are so many kids out there that need homes. I have a home and lots of love to give. I really think that I'd make a good mom! If I'm having trouble finding Mr. Right, why do I need to put my dream of being a mom on hold?!
Looking for healthy recipes to get rid of the post-baby weight? Collect them here visually and you’ll never need to comb through your old bookmarks again.
The idea driving the show is common, Davis and Langois simply take images open to various projections of meaning and place them on the wall. However, I see no attempt to empty meaning from these works by leaving their interpretations loose; content leaks in from all sides.
Aroma/Bouquet (0-4): I could smell the hops when i opened the bottle. Full of Citrus aroma. Delicious! 4 points
Why am I so tired, my soul so drained
Biscotti is another favorite of mine to bake. I started experimenting about a year ago and have made several different versions. My daughter is a fan and enjoys sneaking a piece while it's cooling. Before I started baking biscotti, I thought it was a difficult process, but it really isn't. Trust me...once you start, you'll be baking biscotti all the time.
It feels weird not having her here now. Sort of like having a child going to camp or something, I guess.
I'm a huge fan of adoption. I support it, and late last year, decided to get involved by doing more than simply writing a check and donating money here and there. I signed up to volunteer to be a mentor to some of these kids. To be a friend, a confidant, someone they could trust and count on.
It would depend on natural justice and good corporate governance and sporting integrity being dumped overboard.
All you need to remember is that YOU can do it, whatever it is! YOU are good enough! YOU do make all the difference! YOU are the key-Open the lock!
A little more inspiration: Windsor Smith's stairwell as seen in domino, August 2007. She began with one very large central piece, adding smaller photographs to the mix, and she opted to unify her grouping with all white frames.
What’s gonna happen? The sun will blast us from afar and we might get a bit brown. Yeah!
We will be posting sketches through out the day on Friday (July 16) and Saturday (July 17) for your inspiration! AND because we wanna keep it fresh you will actually have 2 chances for the grand prize with EACH SKETCH!!!!! So, yup....you can actually complete each sketch TWICE BUT there is a catch....(you know there has to be a catch)....
We also have here in Austin a music group called Heartsong which I am super jazzed about checking into. The class involves singing, dancing and instruments and in which both the kids and parents participate. You take home a cd of the music that was sung during the group so your baby/kiddo can listen to it in the car and at home.
So that is just a little peek into the things I enjoy in China. Headed to Beijing for the weekend and I am sure I will have some great stories from that as well as my first week of teaching Freshmen next week!
Youhou! I fulfilled resolution n°5! Yes, I did it! I finally received MY Tiffany’s charm: an adorable reindeer with a tiny, little red nose. It may seem as a simple “go-to-the-shop” resolution to you, but it isn’t that easy when the Tiffany’s shop in Paris doesn’t have the charm in its stock and the one in NY doesn’t ship overseas. But some stalking and a fake reputation of being a good client helps a lot…
This time with the left over Egg Whites i made single serve mini Pavlova's
Today was Ronald Star Day at work… Vicki decided she was in the mood for Qdoba, I quickly jumped on that bandwagon, Cheryl was right behind me, and Nancy had no choice but to acquiesce gracefully at that point. So instead of Ronald Star, it was Qdoba Star Day today. So tasty! It was decided that I’ll remind them to enter their weight into our system on Monday for the Ultimate Slim Down contest and then every Friday thereafter until the contest concludes. We’ve all agreed to be ultra good over the next twelve weeks. Technically, we can all squeak Ronald Star into the diet, but I wouldn’t mind skipping the Ronald part of the day in favor of bringing my lunch and just taking a Star break instead. We shall see.
4) Noah from The Unbecoming of Mara Dyer by Hodkin
Okay, so the extra sweet from the brown sugar on top was a bit sweet, next time I’ll work on a bourbon sauce, I just didn’t have any bourbon on hand this time. Otherwise, this was so yummy, it looked beautiful, it was the perfect texture…and no, my kids weren’t crazy about it. I think if they would’ve given it more of a chance, they might have loved it…they just thought it mostly looked weird. I think that was my opinion of bread pudding when I was a kid. So much lost time, sigh.
So, I cried. My legs gave out. I fell to the damp ground as I let more tears wash over my face.
dad couldn’t die.
My Fevered Brain
Not too late?
because of their occult practices and contacts (such as trance
I took a couple of photos of it spread on the floor but they didn't come out right, so I'll take a couple more soon.
I'm so excited for Christmas. I love the whole thing. The lights, the tree, the food, and of course we can not forget the presents. This year it took us a while but we got our tree and I got the house all decorated.
Pilgrims are invited to bring a picnic lunch.
SOUNDS LIKE: Being… on… drugs.
How to Shoot a Sporting Match
The papers are from the digi set Oh So Shabby from Raspberry Rd, printed onto linen card and lightly inked around the edges with antique linen distress ink. I've had my eye on Raspberry Rd papers for a while, but I couldn't work out whether it was ok to sell the cards I made with them - finally got round to sending them an email at the weekend and had a speedy reply back saying individual handmade items are fine to sell... so I downloaded quite a few different ones, they're all so pretty!
I can't wait to put my sundresses and flip flops on and bask in its glory.
Diana of london super long wear eye liner pencil is easily available across the nation at any leading cosmetics stores for Rs. 360 pkr ( I bought mine from Imtiaz Super store, Nazimabad )
# You now have to beat the Prime Cup's Master Ball division using a three-Pokmon team that always contains Pikachu. Pikachu has to be in every one of the eight battles, but it doesn't actually have to battle.
Yes, friends, neighbors, and countrymen... someone has STOLEN the women's restroom sign. If you see it wandering the streets aimlessly, please return it to the staff. We miss it.
Giovanna (Genni) Gambale, 27, New York, N.Y.
Following this false start, Rich holed up with an 8-track and a Casio and set about creating new worlds from above his mum's hair salon in Nottingham under the Echoboy moniker. He signed to Mute at the start of the Noughties and his debut album (Volume 1) was critically acclaimed and adored by me. I've posted Broken Hearts above - the point at which a supergroup featuring members of Neu!, Kraftwerk and Spiritualized come together to make some of the most affecting instrumental music you are ever likely to hear. The whole album is a belter. He made two more albums for Mute, including the brilliant Giraffe, which was produced by Flood. His last outing as Echoboy was Elektrik Soul Psymphonie in 2006.
Who are we to be so safe? We sit in our safe, warm rooms, writing, and we think nothing of it. Women fought and died for our rights, to speak as the men speak, freely and without fear. We gather, we protest, we write.
I stopped by the liquor store on the way home from work the other day to pick up a six pack of Land Shark Lager. At the checkout stand, I came across these intriguing freezable adult treats and had to buy a couple.
Somehow, her father had kept from her the news of the loss of the Titanic and to her, in 1915 and 1988, it was still the greatest ship afloat. I was talking to someone who had seen the Titanic, but had no idea it had sunk.
- The original recipe calls for chopped bittersweet chocolate, and I tried it once that way and once with bittersweet chips. (I used Ghirardelli 60% chocolate in both cases.) I preferred the chopped chocolate because the pieces were smaller, so it gave the sense that there was more chocolate. But if you want to keep it quick and simple, chips will do the job.
Hello. It’s me.
So how do we save ourselves and our culture from the Jesus of our own making? Nichols suggests that we need to get back to the tradition of the creeds and the tradition of Scripture. We need the creeds because they have helped to solidify the teaching of Scripture pertaining to, of many things, the deity of Christ. While creedal tradition can help we must ultimately rest our understanding of Christ on Scripture. When we rest on Scripture we cannot help but conclude that Jesus is God.
During our marriage she would cry herself to sleep at times because I would never admit I was wrong; but, then again, neither would she. Though we both were headstrong and stubborn to the death, ours was a magnificent and volatile marriage where passion lived, the drama many times leading to bouts of unquenchable intimacy. But that was a lifetime ago.
And now, I’m off to take in this day. Have a good one, chickens!
Each week, I will choose an emotion, a topic, a theme that God has placed in my heart. Pouring through scripture and penning my prayers, I believe God will bring wisdom, encouragement and peace to my heart and to those who will be joining me here on this blog. Along with scriptural insight, I want to pray. Prayer unleashes God’s mighty power in our lives.
2010.08.25 Yemen Zinjibar 4 1 al-Qaeda gunmen on motorcycles massacre four security men in a drive-by.
This week it is B
Who do you say I am?
Am I putting my future in safe hands? Certainly I have faith in the idea of the Goddess circle determining my fate, but to be honest I want to see a facial reaction to my question, to my needs. Still I persist; it is all I have on this very comfortable flight. An old lady in a sari sits next to me. She is going to see her son, this she told me as we were sitting down. I smiled politely and put on head phones. They stayed on for the flight; I need space, quiet to build my own history, my own future.
Do you have a safe room?
Me "Yes baby what is it?"
drive one morning when Herald found him with a fresh impala kill up a tree near camp. I guess he didn’t have a choice about running away, as with three hyenas below him, he had no where to go. Not that he would have in any case! At first I was convinced it was Argyle Jnr, as he seemed so relaxed in the tree, and he looks a lot like his mother – I was thus a bit disappointed it wasn’t Argyle Jnr, as she had been seen on our airstrip the day before with her two cubs. Still, we had a great sighting of this young male, and I even returned after breakfast and watched him lying on the ground a few metres from me, quite happy with my presence! He was less happy when the hyenas came towards him, and he again sprung up the tree and went to sleep just above us! It was wonderful to see him so relaxed, and while I was sad to head back to Johannesburg, it was fantastic news to hear that he stayed with his kill for another 5 days and became even more relaxed over the course of the week; yet again our patience has paid off, and this once skittish male can now provide great viewing!
we live vicariously with the play of
If the saving of souls, of your neighbours’ souls, of many souls, from everlasting misery, be worth your labor, up and be doing! If you would be the fathers of many that are born again, and would ‘see of the travail of your souls,’ and would be able to say at last, ‘Here am I, and the children whom thou hast given me’ — up and ply this blessed work! If it would do your heart good to see your converts among the saints in glory, and praising the Lamb before the throne; if it would rejoice you to present them blameless and spotless to Christ, prosecute with diligence and ardor this singular opportunity that is offered you. If you are ministers of Christ indeed, you will long for the perfecting of his body, and the gathering in of his elect; and you will ‘travail as in birth’ till Christ be formed in the souls of your people. You will embrace such opportunities as your harvest-time affords, and as the sunshine days in a rainy harvest, in which it is unreasonable and inexcusable to be idle.
After regular backpacking breakfast we left Rita in the camp and headed to the Clear Creek trail. The plan was to just walk till lunch, then come back. The trail started a bit further up Bright Angel Canyon.
Now that you’re equipped with the basics of professional note-taking, you can join me in my fantasy parallel world. Just don’t be TOO competitive and take that Note Master promotion out of my hands!
So, I will today be studying Japanese almost all afternoon and I have class tonight (2 hours).
Trainer: Venetia Williams Breeder: Alexandre Deschere Jockey: Aidan Coleman
Are they on the lam for crimes committed in another tree? Or maybe they just don't like having their picture taken. (I also dislike having my picture taken.) I'm pretty sure they're house finches; they had pretty little red throats and seemed kind of finchy. Sometimes the little birds are hard to tell apart - but I like All About Birds as a destination to figure it all out.
Once we got into Malawi the huge mass of people on the road in comparison to Zambia was incredible. Everyone was trying to share the road with the cars- bicycles, pedestrians, animal drawn carts and people in wheel chairs (this is no exaggeration). The vehicles horn got a lot of action once we crossed into Malawi just to serve as a warning sign to people as you pass by for them to not suddenly pull right, or try to run across the road. I’d hate to compare this to Moses parting the Red Sea with his staff… but on some scale this comparison is justified. On the way to Lilongwe the road at some points was so narrow that only one vehicle could safely go at a time because of a good 12 inch drop on either end from poorly kept roads via erosion. My biggest worry was sending a poor cyclist flying off the edge because we either bumped or scared them- because it happened to me multiple times the year before on a cross country cycling trip, and being forced off is a sure way to ruin a day.
- Asparagus bunch
And all due to my Thanksgiving menu.
Ultimately, the internet, television and social networking were tools to be used by the Tunisians who took to the streets. Internet revolutions are a work in progress that began in Belgrade. In 1998 Slobodan Milosevic, the president of Yugoslavia, banned the opposition radio station B-92. Its journalists used the internet and servers in Amsterdam to get their stories out. Two years later the Milosevic regime was brought down by a popular uprising.
With the on-cast of action and thriller movies, Vogue+ Correspondent Ayesha Abdool Hay tells you more about a refreshing recently released rom-com…
to influence or persuade people – “Money talks, BS walks.”
The aesthetic quality of a product is integral to its usefulness because products we use every day affect our person and our well-being. But only well-executed objects can be beautiful.
Out on the Town Dates
And struggle slacker—but to prove
The Bell:
I think I have the only kids in the entire world who actually don’t like eggs. Sure they’ll eat them when I hide them in foods (sausage-bread-egg-cheese casseroles are considered yummy) and will on occasion eat scrambled eggs if I use onions and (really good) cheddar cheese, but a fried egg? Soft boiled egg? A hard boiled egg? There is just no way.
Hello Dear readers ♥
Will: Government always responds to
For this article, I asked Eric if he would like to contribute something special for our ever-expanding blog. He said he would be very pleased to make a contribution to the truth of oneness and granted us permission to publish an entire chapter from his book Liberation from the Lie. I thought it would be beneficial for our readers if he would give a short intro and or summarized some of the terminology he uses throughout the book, especially since the chapter we are featuring (chapter 20), is on page 251. In a nut-shell this chapter focuses on ending the burden of psychological projection. Please enjoy the writing - Matthew K.
But even then, if those guys had become teachers and taught the best way to weld and bend metal openly to anyone interested, the more minds involved would have innovated faster, more knowledge would have been gained in a collective, and the cheaper their services could have become, thus making demand for their services higher and higher. In essence: more people would have had metal fences, new shoes, and wooden bowls.
Mix the water, vinegar, sugar, salt and shichimi togarashi in a saucepan. Bring to a full boil to dissolve sugar. Alternatively put the ingredients in a large glass measuring cup and heat to boiling in microwave.
(iii) Were you, or one of your siblings, born on or after September 4, 1951?
Their clothes are well-priced, and well-made. They size generously, and my kids have had 2 years wear out of some items. I've never seen a seam unravel or a button fall off.
As Captain Cook first stepped foot on Australian soil at Kurnell which lies within the Shire’s boundaries, it can be argued that the Sutherland Shire is the birthplace of modern Australia. Kurnell today is home to the now three years old Kurnell Desalination Plant, the subject of much controversy surrounding noise and water contamination in Botany Bay.
as you’re spitting blood across the soil,
This is an amazing and beautiful story... and so totally worthy of the tissues you will need by the end! We all remember our first dance... only the two of you on the dance floor, holding each other close, and swaying to your favorite song as all of your family and friends watch the special moment.
what I have to do to BE there for him, to help him navigate the waters of
Commercially available combined charging stations are projected to be available later this year. All committed OEMs have vehicles in development which will use the Combined Charging System.
We enjoyed a short afternoon at the beach within the first couple days here. Since then, it's been off to the 'git-er-done' races. He put shelves in a useless closet under the stairs and made me a brilliant, new pantry. He helped me hang up all my family pictures and my Terry Redlin and Norman Rockwell plates. He then got busy cleaning my garage, but worked himself out of a job there. He's made shelves for my daughter's room, a shoe rack for the front entry and built a lean-to in the back yard. Eventually, he had to sit down. When my Dad sits, he sleeps. BUT, not only does he deserve the rest, he NEEDS the rest. His body is still recovering from a bad shoulder injury that required surgery a few months ago. Hence, the picture I have for you today. They were both sacked out and not drooling, so I thought taking a picture would be appropriate. :-)
On the train ride back, we discovered that Japanese trains have heated seats. It was pretty amazing – a little too amazing, though, because Jason couldn’t keep his eyes open on the way home! We made it back to the station closest to Zach and Miyako’s house and took a nice, brisk, 15-minute walk in the unseasonably cold weather back to the apartment. It was a beautiful, albeit cold, night. And, as we walked the sporadically lit streets and alleyways that would have proved sketchy and unsafe in America, it was as if we were walking in the daytime. I felt no sense of danger or threat that would have normally been present in a similar situation in the states.
One of the purposes of society and the ultimate dilemma of free will is the very struggle between order and chaos. We surrender our freedoms willingly in order to live together in a society and avoid the Hobbesian nightmare world. The star child seems to imply that the "chaos" that organic life represents is this sort of conundrum writ large--where does the good of the individual end and the good of all begin and vice-versa. This spectrum is dealt with in the series, but the resolution of this very human puzzle is relegated to one or two lines. So, too, is the inevitability of synthetic and organic life in perpetual conflict--this is relegated to a single line. I'd be tempted to argue that this entirely ignores Asimov's Three Laws, but the star child seems to be the embodiment of the Zeroth Law. While this is interesting, it's another idea that's discarded without adequate expansion or discussion by the final dialogue.
Then, the other morning, I reached down to pick up what I thought was black yarn (I really need to clean my glasses, evidently), and it was one of these little guys:Northern ringneck? Southern ringneck? Anyway, he has a ringed neck. I found this pic on the internet.
part of me is happy cuz sometimes you have missed it but another part of me is furious because i still dont understand why it became the way it became because by the moment you never saw anything wrong, but the Good in a person untill one small thing destroys everything. and one thing i hate is being disappointed
9. Head Down
Usually when you buy a box of Dolly wink lashes, it contains 2 pairs of same lashes. This limited edition contains upper and lower lashes.
From this chakra we often have a feeling that we have known someone before, from another life or time. “We tend to connect with those with whom we have unfinished business’. Pg 212 The opportunity for growth comes when we are asked to be loving when we are dealing with someone who is very unco-operative. “…they are our teachers”. Pg 212 Many times we feel drawn to certain people, this is no accident, we are meant to continue to learn together.
Now for some color inspiration from our Design Team. be sure to stop by their blogs to see the color palettes they used.
It can be a cliché to call someone a good person, and after all, who are we to make that sort of judgment? But it’s easy to see when there’s someone one can admire, whose company is treasured, and whose absence leaves a hole. It’s indisputably true there’s no one like her, and Gina will be very greatly missed.
Last week, The Globe and Mail ran an interesting series on school lunch (I was interviewed for it—check me out going on about the evils of marketing to children here). All in all, it presented a rather bleak portrait of Canadian (high) school lunch: cafeteria meals analyzed from one school were high in fat, grease and sodium, at another teens were teased if they brought homemade, non-packaged food, and at schools that had reformed their food service, kids were rejecting the healthy options.
And wonder around in an artist's haze,
Good point. I guess that consciously playing yourself well is a difficult first step in RPGs, and then playing someone you're not well is much more difficult. That's where I'm at.
Which wouldn't be an incredibly big deal except the cats sometimes get it into their heads to pee on dirty laundry. Which I actually kind of understand ("Ooo, look this smells bad, must be a new toilet."). But when they do that, you can bet one hundred percent I'm the one who has to clean up the mess. Also, the dog has been known to gnaw the end off a sock or two.
He is my Shepherd and I am His little lamb.
Paul Edmondson, team manager, commented:“Tom produced an extremely strong ride over the weekend, the bike performed as he liked and to take the lead this early on is a real confidence boost. I’m pleased to have put another Suzuki on the top step, although I’m aching a fair bit today! And with Lee coming back into his first round after injury it’s been a great weekend all round.”
and I started thinking of the different ways I could use it. This is what I ended up with...
Will the DCC (Dungeon Crawl Classics) be the next big thing the rpg community supports? Already there are a number of companies producing material for the system and it is not even released yet. There is definitely an enthusiasm surrounding it, but I suspect it is too much of a niche system to become wide-spread. Maybe I'll be wrong on that count.
SPOKEN:
I love, LoVe, LOVE stamps that can sit underneath and extend from centre piece stamps, and put these to use with a happy heart! I kept the stamping mono so as not to take away too much from the green papers... And I inked up a new piece of cotton lace, also new at the Waltzingmouse Store with a copic marker and topped it with a row of buttons. The label is popped with foam tape and finished with a few brown pearls.
Kong purists usually rank Escapes on the far low end of their scale when it comes to what they will accept their King in. Badness is all but guaranteed for your monster movie, though, when its premiere in North America is on a double-billing with that classic Don Knotts comedy The Shakiest Gun in the West. Gotta wonder which one played first.
Uh, okay.
With his ice-blue eyes and cheerful character, Huey makes Hannah forget about her tough time at school. Can Huey charm her classmates so that everyone can be friends together?
Every year, billions of dollars are lost in corporate espionage and the theft of intellectual property. While technology has certainly made our jobs easier, protecting your confidential information has become more important than ever. Everything from your telecommunications systems to your computer network to your boardrooms and company cars, nothing is safe from the threats of spying. Your business deals with important and sensitive information vital to your success every day. If that information is compromised, you could suffer significant loss of income from lost business, as well as possible legal ramifications for failing to secure that information. It is also important to consider that such a breach could irrevocably mar the reputation of your company in the eyes of existing and potential clients, your shareholders, and the public. Just imagine what damage one video or audio recording device could cause if hidden in your executive conference room. Evaluating your risk is vital to maintaining your business continuity, security and peace of mind, and the risk of electronic eavesdropping should be a big part of your organizations overall risk management strategy.
“She had a loving spirit and a great sense of humor,” Damron said. “She was just sweet as could be.”
The other soldier charged, swinging his weapon like a club. Khostov caught the gun by the barrel, wrenched it from his hands, and then struck the stormtrooper hard enough that Stolik heard his neck break from the impact. He fell to the ground like a sack of flour.
Never in a million years did I think I would take a bathroom mirror picture! The things I do for 12athon!
It pours a very fizzy frothy head that took about a good seven minutes to die down and settle very carbonated! The colour of the beer is a dark yellow orangy haze much like coopers red but with no sediment or floaties. 4.9% ABV
It's funny, isn't it, how our tastes differ from year to year. I wish I had my Christmas afghans from previous years. One year I made one out of Red Heart, in Cranberry, a gold, and a color called eggnog. Ater that year, I think Red Heart quit making that color called eggnog, and that is a shame, because I loved that color. It was a warm cream, not a cool cream.
Other overseers are using their dictatorial powers to break union contracts.
…your soul feels at peace?
I also use thigh meat because I prefer dark to white meat, but you can use the breast. I threw the thighs on a sheet pan with some salt and pepper and roast for about 40 minutes, flipping halfway through. I roasted it at 350 since I didn’t need a crusty outside or anything.
Stamp the chicks and eggs more than once so you can cut out and color extra eggs to fill up your basket or Easter layout. Feel free to trim one or both chicks off your stamped images or omit inking them with a marker to suit your layout. have fun mixing the chicks and bunnies together.
I believe it was on a Tuesday afternoon and the salon was hopping. It turned out that P had started teaching a class at the local community college and on that particular day he was teaching the new students in his salon. When he saw me at the front counter, he threw up a hand in greeting and squealed, "GGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGG, Hola`, Chica. My goodness, what has happened to your coif? P did such a fabulous job on you last time."
I’m forever in pursuit and I don’t even know what I am chasing. – Harold M. Abrahams, Chariots of Fire
In recognition of this, the European Union's Innovative Medicines Initiative gave some of its first grants to pain researchers to work with pharmaceutical firms to try to speed up the process of finding new drugs.
he doesn’t
melrose street in l.a.,
Allow pepper and leek to soften, about 7 minutes.
So if this sounds like fun and you'd like to go, this is my advice:
DEPARTED BONUS UNLISTED SELECTIONS
In such an environment, exceptional job performance is both required and expected. In a high-pressure workplace, when you lead a team of 70 people, it is imperative that everyone knows what is expected of them at all times. In my company, we formalize those expectations in writing, and through regular performance dialogs we check on how people are performing against those expectations. One of the ways we accomplish this is by setting up goals and objectives for them. In work-related terms, this is a good thing; people sometimes get off track, and goals and objectives help keep people aligned and moving forward at a similar pace and trajectory.
This is why if I had a million dollars I would somehow gather up the rights for all the non-rereleased Homestead releases, start up a reissue label, and get these classic records back in print and up to speed in the digital era. There's no reason why half the Homestead catalog - if not more - languishes in out-of-print obscurity, and more often than not never made available on CD from the start. I'd also pay royalties, both earned from my stewardship, and unpaid from Homestead's tenure.
The U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, which was set to approve the guidance as early as today, deleted the item from a meeting agenda without explanation. The Chamber, in an April 19 letter to Cass Sunstein, administrator of the White House Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, said the guidance could hurt businesses. The advice would help employers comply with the Americans With Disabilities Act on issues such as extended leave and making accommodations for the disabled workers.
* This is the personal opinion of the writer and does not necessarily represent the views of The Malaysian Insider
By Nicholas Stix
qa1176
The collection will Justin Bieber Doll presented immediately after the sale on December 1, with indications that the limited supply. This means that large stores but shipments of the doll quite a stress for adults and, perhaps, should try sites such as amazon and eBay as Justin and specialized web sites to look for Christmas holidays We pursue new toy.
It´s an old priory and she restores it, seemingly respectful, keeping as much of the outer structure as she can save. She paints its chapel golden and laughs when a friend refers to the golden calf and calls it blasphemy.
When we started this blog a few years ago, we did have a purpose- to share with each other a bit of our daily lives and offer support as only women and friends can give in the joys and in the hard times at work, at play or at home all day. I have decided to write with this in mind, but, to do so instead for one specific person, so in the end the focus is the same. I have a sister who I love very deeply- we don't live too far apart, but, far enough away that we do not see each other more than once a month and sometimes less. We don't get to talk as much as we used to, but, I think about her constantly. It is not that we do not try, but, as every woman knows, life gets in the way. When we do talk it is only moments at a time and sooner or later a distraction pops up and we are going off in our different directions again.
Our Botrytised Riesling is a kind of wine equivalent to lambic beers, both in how Sam describes its production, and in the effect it has on my palate.
and the Winner is...........
where you were registered as a Muslim and kept that faith for 31 years,
The Schmidt’s youngest daughter had gone quiet but she was squirming on the ground.
But 3 weeks in the power company turned off all power to the flat, again the host was difficult to reach, a few hours later after Airbnb managed to get in touch with them the host explained to us that it was due to them not having paid their electricity bill the last few months (seriously?!) they then proceeded to rig us up with electricity by stealing it from the neighboring apartment.
I try to capture every minute
Don’t forget disability! I don’t like ‘issue’ books because so often they focus on one person with one ‘issue’. They’re surrounded by ‘normal’ people and their problem is solved by a wise counsellor. I fear books like this could make one feel even more isolated.
Mr. Hot and I recently had the pleasure of dining at NICO Kitchen + Bar located at the NJPAC on what may be the most picturesque corner in Newark. We enjoyed many dishes that demonstrate NICO’s “Italian without borders” approach to cuisine.
I am really looking forward to the weekend and some much-needed patio time! We like to sit out back with a fire in the chiminea and put peanuts out and watch the squirrels and the birds in our “nature show”! We are loving our Florida life-style! TGIF! Thank God it’s Friday or my favorite, This Grandma is Fantastic! Happy Weekend everyone!
"I decided to make this video after the brutal attack by so called robbers on a one year old baby girl. I want the world to see just what the so called new South Africa is really like, to warn all potential sokker / football fans who want to visit the country for the World Cup, and to highlight the genocide against the Boer / Afrikaner / White comunity of South Africa.
This is what happens when you get antsy and don't double check to make sure you have indeed removed all of the printer paper.
Right now we are are resting up at hotel Crestwood trying to catch our breath!
Yet the concept is still a sound one. It offers the best hope, in fact, to cure a host of ills. To make any real impact, though, the creation of our Green Economy has to be implemented on a massive, national scale. It’ll be like a 21st century version of the Tennessee Valley Authority, but on steroids.
AND, food. We will have some yummy food to enjoy from the Lucky Lab on Hawthorne. Yuuuuum.
Genius prone
Share one thing you're nostalgic for from your childhood, and I'll enter you into the drawing. Two lucky winners will get a pack of Garbage Pail Kids in the mail.
Doesn’t the man in your life get a glassy present too?
Other essays in the book deal with such topics as the theme of isolation in Lovecraft’s fiction (Stefan Dziemianowicz); Lovecraft’s cosmic imagery (Steven J. Mariconda); Lovecraft’s progression from a macabre writer to a cosmic writer (David E. Schultz); and Lovecraft’s “artificial mythology” and its development (Robert M. Price). Essays by Peter Cannon, Robert H. Waugh, R. Boerem, Norman R. Gayford, and Barton L. St. Armand round out the volume.
He remembers snippits of the past
Nurse: "Bale, Malaria, Hepatitis at HIV test po."
List of Tables are also include.
20. The “Sixth Sick Sheik’s Sixth Sheep’s Sick” is the hardest tongue-twister.
4 green onions, diced
But here we are, 2 years exactly after her birth and tonight she possibly had her last ever breastfeed, booby or booboo as she calls it... this is not my choice, it is hers. And while I'm overjoyed that this was her choice (as I know in my heart it should be), I'm not going to deny that a little tiny piece of my heart is broken because of it.
This weekend it was sunny and it snowed, and Oprah didn’t buy the penthouse. Vancouver is a crazy place. I love it to death, never mind my occasional mad rant. Isn’t being a curmudgeon is part of who we are? Whether it’s Kerrisdale NIMBYs, Bus Riders’ Unionists, or anyone perched on the steps of the art gallery, Vancouver people find purpose in a constant state of upset.
This banking conglomerate is these days considered as a criminal organization pur sang and countries like Spain, Greece and Germany have stopped doing business with Goldman’s suicide bankers, as they’ve been called by journalist Max Keiser. Currently GS is investing through its Capital Partners VI-fund (more than 20 billion dollars).
Asked a surprised Moon.
They did.
The more I read about the condition that our daughter is being tested for: mitochondrial disease, the more I realize that individuals with this disorder are the real life, present day canaries in this “coal mine” called life.
Thy saints in all this glorious war
I’m not sure if I was more excited to have a beautiful sunny weekend in London because of the opportunity to be outside or because it meant I could test out the Freeloader, solar charger I was lent!? Made by Solar Technology International, the charger looks very cool – small, sleek with brushed aluminium finish which I, as a designer find appealing. It is also very easy to use; you pull sides apart and push the solar panels into the sides of the main body, place it in the sunshine and watch the flashing display show that the charger is charging.
Women Riders Month is an opportunity to celebrate the empowerment of women riders around the world and inspire more women to find their voice on a Harley-Davidson of their own. Throughout May, Harley-Davidson Motor Company and its worldwide network of dealers will host events to welcome women into the sport of motorcycling.
A crucial part of parenting is providing our children with information so that they know what is appropriate or expected in a given situation. As parents we also need to be aware of our children's limits and abilities so that we can help them avoid or navigate situations that may be challenging for them in any way. Having a relationship based on trust and respect, along with having a history of providing our children with accurate factual information, makes it possible for our children to remain open and receptive to information that we provide. This process begins at a very young age. We help our children understand why we are quiet in a library or we wait for our turn to go down the slide. The more we can provide information about they "why" and help our children be prepared before they go into a new situation the easier the experience will be for both parent and child. If we manage to stay connected with our children we will be less likely to look up and react harshly or negatively when a calm and supportive response would better help our child. If we stay with our child we can provide them with information relating to our experience, "The stairs are a bit slippery here so I'm going to hold onto the railing. Would you like to hold my hand or hold onto the railing, too?" We can also help them understand expectations relating to specific public places, "It's polite to be quiet in the library because people are reading or trying to concentrate and loud noises might be distracting." And we have the opportunity to share with them why there are laws and rules about certain behaviors, "There are rules about not picking flowers in this park. We aren't allowed to pick flowers because if everyone who came here picked flowers there wouldn't be anymore flowers for other people to enjoy."
So, if you are an e-reader type person, go ahead, go tell Madam Ladybug that you want in!
The past few weeks have been so nice I went in search of a good low-fat/ lower calorie frozen treat. I came across this recipe on 101 Cookbooks after doing a little research. It is simple, easy and fast!
The important thing about the third conditional is that both the condition and result are impossible now, that’s why it is called Past Unreal Conditional. Sometimes, we use should have, could have, might have instead of would have, for example: If you had bought a lottery ticket, you might have won.
Have I made the right decisions, though?
Siobhan Winter-Smith stood in solidarity with Bradley Manning outside the military base at Fairford, Gloucestershire on the first day of Bradley Manning’s pre-trial ‘motions’ hearing last week.
End of discussion.
I am still sitting here with empty arms, waiting. Just wish I could do something besides wait.
Or because time and chance throws you in together with someone under the most peculiar circumstances and paves a road for you to take?
585 D-VI/8/1969. “Prudence and Principle: Aristotle and The Melian Dialogue.” Basic Program Graduation, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
The colours have not photographed well with the iPad so I might re scan when I get home, the lime green is in the argyle background dsp and the yellow is actually quite bright.
2. Billy Budd (Vauxhall)
She has taught creative writing for Strathclyde University’s English Studies Dept and for Glasgow University’s Department of Adult and Continuing Education, and completed her doctorate in 2008. She currently works at Strathclyde University as a Royal Literary Fund Fellow. She lives in Glasgow with her two children.
*Remember that the dough will begin to lose its ability to hold fine detail after about an hour.
To enter the giveaway, leave a comment on this post by Monday, September 27, 2010 about either (1) how you keep mornings all cheery and positive or (2) whether or not you always have breakfast. Entrants must be U.S. residents at least 18 years old. One entry per post per person. To get an additional entry, blog or tweet the contest and then leave a comment with a link to the post or tweet.
Eleanor Antin (1 set of postcards, 1971-1973)
It has baffled me for years why a growing number of pubs refuse to provide mats. Espec­ially with the now-universal adoption of brim measure glasses, they perform a useful role in soaking up spilt and overflowing beer, stopping it staining tables and running off the edge to spoil your clothes. I’m convinced it comes from the same misguided school of “trying not to look like an old-fashioned boozer” that has led to the widespread ripping out of bench seating.
Jesus was blunt in his teachings about money.
“I love you and till I see you again next time. Be good,” Selsor said.
The first of these councils, the famous Nicea Council, denounced Arianism, a teaching that Christ was a created being. The three councils that followed took up other aspects of the relationship between Christ’s divinity and humanity.
"The Purple of the Balkan Kings" is a story seemingly about a great player in Balkan politics, exiled for now, waiting to return to his throne. Saki likes to write about government officials and royalty. The ending is pretty good.
According to Suaram lawyer Joseph Brehem, the investigations on the French side have so far provided sufficient evidence to suspect that “specific” Malaysian officials did take ‘bribes’ or kickbacks from Scorpenes vendor DCN – which is illegal under the French law.
problems have solutions
Vintage peanut butter glasses
At this present stage in history, you could argue that home-made entertainment probably outweighs "proper" funded entertainment by a small margin. You can click on YouTube and watch endless videos of members of the public trying to be funny, singing mediocre cover versions on their acoustic guitars and Comet purchased electronic keyboards, pointing their cameras at their dogs attempting to dance the cha-cha, or their superstar babies puking, burping or crying about finger nibbling savagery (which mystifyingly some broody/ maternal people have decided to watch millions of times over in the belief that it constitutes humorous entertainment). If it's a popular video, chances are you'll also be forced to watch an advert beforehand, thereby diverting cash into the coffers of the amateur film-makers in question.
Glass family, Just use your ownership box at the K and act like you give a damn or just sell the team already.
Fold your strip of fabric in half lengthwise and tie a knot in the end...
father's boxers
If my sports-imitating-life theory holds true, then we can look forward to a time when our friendship will be effortless. We can reminisce on the past, and discuss collaborations for the future. My theory has a compelling model for this argument. Just look at Larry and Magic.
walking high as I pass by.
Earrings - Kohl's
Indeed, Syed Mustafa is reported to have made reference to the fact that the tear gas grenades, tear gas canisters, liquid eye irritants and pepper spray, all of which were deployed on April 28, had complied “with international standards set by the United Nations”. However he does not appear to have clarified to which particular UN standard he was referring.
Hydraulic KERS
After adding to free speech by blocking me on Twitter Professor Simon Chapman’s Tweets come to me second hand. This happened after his savaging by Professor Carl V Phillips on his Ep-ology blog and a piece entitled “How can you tell Simon Chapman is mucking about over his head?”
"Not at all. Brigham Young told us--"
What I am I trying to say is that I was feeling like “crap” and just had no desire to continue. But what I soon discovered is that feelings come and go and desires come and go. And then I realized that I let my circumstances dictate how I felt.
After Steaming.........
Anyway I'm also working really hard on my new blogskin!! I know right, so sick of this old one!!
Songwriting is a craft and there are certain rules (in ever genre) but sometimes rules need to be broken. And then there is always the question of who really makes the rules? Is it the listener who demands more of the same, or is it the industry who delivers what they think is best and most appropriate for the audience?
Now, if you don’t mind, please smeg off and watch Red Dwarf. Thanks!
I was really wanting to ues my poinsettia Spellbinders die for this when I was assigned to this challenge.
For my card I got to use this gorgeous whimsical image by Hope Jacre called "Three Candyfloss Trees" which I totally loved colouring - you really should go see her Etsy shop. Her images are amazing!! I kept the card fairly simple as the image is busy enough on its own.
CyberSkin® is unquestionably the most realistic material on the market. Quickly warming to body temperature and mimicking the elasticity and softness of human flesh, CyberSkin® has the amazing look and feel of real skin. This material in its many shapes and forms is a stunning replication of the human composition.
The Indian thali not only restrict itself to festivities and everyday foods. There are thali's that are prepared during religious functions and fasts.Today, I am presenting to you one of the thali's that are prepared for the fasting period / Vratha.
Breakfast: Home-made Bircher muesli
The climate of Bangladesh is mostly determined by its location in the tropical monsoon region: high temperature, heavy rainfall, often excessive humidity, and distinct seasonal variations. The reversal of the wind circulation between summer and winter is another important feature of the climate of the country. The climate of Cox’s bazar is mostly similar to the rest of the country. It is further characterised by the location in the coastal area. The annual average temperature in Cox’s Bazar remains at about a maximum of 34.8 °C and a minimum of 16.1 °C. The average amount of rainfall remains at 4,285 mm.
- Challenge ends Midnight the 9th!
1 1/2 cups shredded mozzarella cheese
1/2 cup of extra virgin olive oil
Koala
Strong friendship that lasts
Writer- Jason Friedberg & Aaron Seltzer
Through tangled juniper, beds of reeds,
I seem to have a problem with memory sticks. I have too many of them. This photo is just of what I found on my desk just now, there are more lurking somewhere (and not all of the lurkers even work, and one ancient thumb-drive requires drivers installing which kind of defeats the object).
she would travel the US and Canada in an RV. She didn't really
Pretty little raven at the bird-band stand
Here is the info about the meeting, as posted by Cigar City:
"Yeah!" Abby jumped up and down, pulling Sam with her. "We get to be with Mum. We're the best in Salem. We could be the best in the world!" She whipped her long, blonde hair behind her head. "Let's find Dad."
In keeping this blog for a semester, I found that it’s actually difficult to locate well-constructed websites that totally captivate the user and perfectly represent whatever that website is promoting. It definitely shows how young the Internet actually is and how young the idea of businesses promoting their service/product on the web is. While many businesses have caught on to the wide array of benefits the Internet has to offer and can create a beautiful and usable website, I still think many other businesses and other organizations are too new to the Internet or simply don’t have the knowledge or tools to create a user-friendly and aesthetic website.
Puget Sound Energy Completes Public Offering Of Series A Notes For $250 Million 22
I am starting a new series on the blog, "Blogger's Home Tours", where you will be treated to a lovely tour of your fellow blogger's homes. Don't you just love home tours?! It's so fascinating and fun to see how other people decorate, not to mention all the amazing ideas and inspiration that you can get from other people's homes.
Have you ever prepared baby artichokes? They’re really easy. Peel off the bottom couple of layers of leaves until you get to a light green color. Trip the bottom a bit, and chop off the top 1/2 inch or so with a sharp knife. Cut in half. Put cut artichoke halves in a bowl with water and a bit of lemon juice or vinegar. This sounds labor intensive but really goes pretty fast.
While his state of mind can be a little unnerving, that which leads him to his downfall is somewhat sympathetic. Gordon is a man so driven by what he believes is his destiny he never stops to wonder if it’s what he really wants. In that respect, the obituary writer is just as dead as the people he writes about.
You just show up at Anderson Gardens at 10:00a.m. on Monday May 7th and sign up. Now, there you go. You do not have to be a member of the YMCA or anything. Just sign up and come.
The three races, 50K, 50 miles and 100K began with 80 participants. There was a record number of entrants at 92! Rajeev, our race director wanted to be certain that everyone knew the directions. The start was right across the street from Lowell High School, an area that I’ve run by in my training and racing so many times at the lake.
This is also my opinion, so you don't have to take my advice if you don't want to.
Salary negotiable depending on skills and experience.
I used the Maraschino Twine. I took three pieces of twine and braided it...just like you would do to your daughter's hair.
According to the NYT article, liberal members of the clergy and gay rights groups have organized competing prayer events in 17 cities, including one called the American Prayer Hour, which is sponsored by Truth Wins Out, a gay rights advocacy organization. The executive director of Truth Wins Out explains the purpose for organizing the alternative prayer event: “They have symbolically taken the mantle of religion, and I think it’s time to take it back. And the American Prayer Hour is a step in that direction.”
Because of this, the program has been able to attract world-class authors to its faculty, authors who are also experienced, accessible teachers. The late Frank McCourt was a beloved member of the summer faculty for a decade, and the equally beloved regular faculty includes Billy Collins, Meg Wolitzer and Roger Rosenblatt.
It’s important to note, sidepods do not contain the KERS batteries or the MGU. Also the gearbox oil and hydraulic fluid coolers are mounted atop the gearbox. There is very in the of little hydraulic systems being in the front of the sidepods, only the lines for the power steering passes this far forward in the car.
Also, some of you may know yesterday was my birthday! Yay! I got fabric from my mom. I sent her a wish list and this is what I got. Sanctuary, Modern Meadow and Central Park. Yummy!
This is my compost pile. Not much to look at. Under that pile of leaves are onion bits, banana peels coffee grounds and pear cores. Thrilling, isn't it?!
A spokesman for the Crown Prosecution Service said: ‘When deciding whether to prosecute any offence, the CPS will consider the Code for Crown Prosecutors and any relevant guidance. The CPS has published guidelines concerning the reasonable use of force in cases where householders choose to defend themselves or their property.
It was also the first election for the 29 new unitary authorities created under the Scotland Act 1994 that replaced the nine old regions, which had been created a mere 20 years earlier.
“But you'll be here all afternoon Shane, Darling... and I can't get myself well till you're finished. I need to soak my feet in the tub to get my knackered old veins up. Please, I'm sick. It'll take me seconds to pop fresh veins like yours... seconds.”
Charging your iPhone in the randomise of coffee cup drench
Just as Natalie was about to retreat back to her car, a door creaked open at the end of a hallway, and an old woman with fuzzy gray hair limped toward her. The woman was short and plump, with a gray shawl to match her hair draped around her shoulders. It was almost like the grandmother from Little Red Riding Hood had jumped from the pages to check Natalie into this place. "I'm sorry, dear," came the creaky voice from the woman as she reached the desk. "I just don't walk as fast as I used to. Can I help you?"
“I’m just glad she didn’t do a movie called `The Devil Wears Pantsuits,’” quipped Clinton, mixing the title of a Streep film with her favored style of clothing.
Andrew Fisher, 42, New York, N.Y.
What He did care about was teaching us to care about each other as He cared about all of us.
The support and outpouring on their fanpage is just incredible. They welcome each new fan by name, they post a candle for anyone who shares their grief at losing someone to suicide, fans support them in ways I’ve not seen before. The compassion and caring is truly heartfelt and warming. I will post a link to their site at the end of this post, please take a moment to check it out, it may very well save someone’s life.
Mr. Reagan instructed acting NASA director Bill Graham to fly to Cape Canaveral with the Vice President to begin probing the cause of the explosion and and then to proceed with the space program. “These people were dedicated to the exploration of space,” the President stated. “We could do no more to honor them, these courageous Americans, than to go forward with the program.”
I guess my point today is this: help me. Help me please! Send me your recipes or your tips. Share your stories of pick eaters. Please reassure me that he’ll grow out of this.
Last week I was down in London for the Walker Books 30th Birthday party - totally starstruck by all the wonderful writers and illustrators gathered there! Back home for a few days of tax returns from which I've now escaped - hooray! - so I'm happily looking forward to my next two visits.
He has to be the Aldo Cornelius spoke of from the Sacred Scrolls in Escape , but he does not fit Cornelius’ story. Aldo was not a slave and he was not the first to say “no” to a human. I am not certain if this is supposed to mean Cornelius and Vera traveling back through time may have altered the future or if it is just retconning. I am just going to chalk it up to the latter rather than go into another mind numbing discussion about the physics of time travel. I am a Calvinist, folks. If it is meant to be, it will be. ’Nuff said.
Official Book Club Selection is a fun read (oh! and there are photos!), just like Kathy Griffin is a fun person. If you’re a fan, pick it up and if you’re not…well, who knows, maybe you will be.
Now layer each ice pop mold with yogurt and plum puree. Start with plum pure and end with plum puree. Next with a skewer make swirl and mix yogurt and plum together.(Don’t mix completely, the white and red color should be seen)
The panelists spoke about another complex issue regarding criminalizing sex traffickers. “The biggest problem with victims is that they’re lousy witnesses because they’ve been so traumatized,” August said.
Next, I take a button, something that's round or whatever fits the size of the flower.
I was like how the hell could Hollywood ruin this… My favourite poem, basically they used a lot of Edgar Allan Poe`s stories, to create one story, some weird ass stuff that I must see.
So Warren Buffett is out of the prefs. Wondering if he stayed with the common. The warrants seem useless for now but you never know.
Finding the unforeseen ideal object requires openness, and a quality of presence that is refreshing. When we pay attention, who knows what we will find in life, or what will find us, at any moment? I actually consider consumer browsing a meditation of sorts, and why not? The Shopping Goddess is real, and loves to smile grandly upon her devotees!
Instead of learning how to play all the popular songs out there, I decided it would be best to write hit songs, become a singer myself, and have others learn my songs. I’m not yet where I’m going, but I’m getting closer every day;-)
2 tsps salted fish (panfry & mashed)
Suddenly wild crying started. It came in bouts – all through the rest of the evening. The crying felt like it belonged to someone having been freed from tremendous pressure and coercion.
Do you remember the Ents from the Lord of the Rings stories?
The following are some signs and symptoms which may lead you suspect that your child has central auditory hearing disorder:
Ian McCulloch wrote the lyrics to "Lips Like Sugar" and "Rollercoaster". The music to "Lips Like Sugar" was written by McCulloch, Will Sergeant and Les Pattinson and the music to "Rollercoaster" was written by McCulloch, Sergeant, Pattinson and Pete de Freitas. "Lips Like Sugar" was produced by Laurie Latham, "Rollercoaster" was produced by The Bunnymen and Gil Norton and "People Are Strange" was produced by Ray Manzarek.
Make sure you center your fabric over the mold. The fabric will need to be wrong side up.
Living My Mommy Life nominated me for a Liebster Award. Liebster is a German word meaning ‘dearest’, ‘beloved’ or ‘favorite’ and the award is given to deserving bloggers with less than 200 followers. The idea is to help them finds more followers by sharing our favorites. So I added “Liebster Blog” to my to-do list. I was so honored to have another blogger think of me in a list of favorite blogs, I was sure I’d get around to posting all about it!
The poor little kiddo clearly doesn't like brushing his teeth because it hurts. And it hurts because he doesn't brush his teeth. Ugh. That's the tough part of this story. One that has been keeping me up at nights since November.
Take it from a band that knew the dangers of fire water better than anyone. Even better, it was the sole contribution of Entwistle on the A Quick One album.... a guy who lived a life of "wine, women and song" to the bitter end. Moon gets most of the attention as being the wild child of the band, a title he certainly came by honestly. But let's not forget Entwistle died of a cocaine fueled heart attack in the company of a prostitute... in 2002!
The last traces of a warm sun on an unusually cheery winter day.
...if I understand you correctly. I'm trying to figure out exactly what it is you believe so I don't ask questions of you that aren't germane to your beliefs. Morey,
The sun has returned to our land.
Bodice, skirt & Shoes--E0000, R000 and 0
Terrorism is on the news again as a Real IRA gunman who shot dead two sappers is handed a twenty five year prison sentence. Having asked for leniency on the grounds of his cystic fibrosis I am pleased to say that he received none. He is expected to die in prison. I cannot help but wonder if he would have preferred the option of hanging? I find all terrorists equally contemptuous irrespective of cultural background. Long prison sentences for attempted or planned atrocities and the death penalty for atrocities carried out should become the norm.
The day comes to an end and were laying in bed, slowly falling asleep
house. They stood like sentinels, the fading light of the sun casting a golden
but it is what I have been doing this tricky month
Cheryl Cole is back in the top 10 dropping out of last year to fellow pop princess Katy Perry down into sixth.
Do you have a preferred medium for producing your illustrations or do you like to experiment?
Everyone has seen these.. and they end the commercials with the same slogan right.. "I'm lovin' it!"
It simply is not the case that an emigrant, who subsequently invests in property and has a mortgage, a career, children in school and a secure environment, will give it all up after 10 or so years just because some politician says they should return to South Africa.
UPDATE: 19th July, 2011. The hearing of this case continues at 11am this morning in Court 9. It was originally scheduled for four days which might mean today sees a conclusion. Judgment likely to be reserved to a future date but given the urgency of the application, it might be quicker than usual.
or when I'm going to get those dishes done,
The whole movie there is this love stroy going on between him and the main girl and they only kiss once the entire movie. Call me a sap, but I was expecting a little more than that. Booooo. Chris Evans did look pretty handsome though. ;)
One may ask, what then is the psyops in this? The answer should be evident if you can understand the conservative nature and pride of the white farmer. Just like music, pictures too can be used as a psychological medium to influence the consciousness of the masses. Advertising mediums do it all the time!
Solution: This is like putting the cart before the horse, and failing to optimize the landing page for your mobile display and search campaigns can cost you valuable conversions. To ensure you’re providing users with a fast mobile experience free of pinching and zooming, check out our guide on “How to Build a Mobile Website.”
“There are a lot of lonely single women on the job, and you’re surrounded by these cute guys. They’re working out. They’re attractive,” she says.
My stomach is still sore today.
Turn your handle through to the right side, but make sure to keep hold of the unstitched end of your elastic. Pin your elastic to the open end of your handle. proceed as before and insert the handle in your prefered position.
CoD elite needs a lot of work. I’ve talked to some of the core team folks working on Elite and I can sympathize how tough it is to launch such a service, but the service needs a lot of…work.
I’m of course writing about Marvel’s “The Avengers,” and you can tell just how important the “Avengers” movie is by the italics I typed in. Italics equals importance. But I was also lying, because any Marvel fan who came of age a few decades ago knows that there was another stretch of time that saw the Hulk, Captain America, Thor and a wide array of Marvel heroes make the leap from the printed page to the silver screen (or gray screen; whatever color screen televisions have). The year in question was 1990 and yes, an Avengers movie was entirely possible.
The article threw the judge into a fit. He threatened to sue the Mr Riddle, the owner of the Daily Commercial Journal who printed The Visiter and threatened Ms Swisshelm with imprisonment in the county jail and a libel suit. Grier demanded a published apology. He didn’t know who he was dealing with in that newspaper editor
H3′s most recent status update on Facebook? “Anyone want 2 teenagers?”
Every year about 3 million deaths are prevented 750,000 children are saved from disability due to vaccines. With the exception of clean drinking water, vaccines are the most effective intervention in reducing and preventing the return of infectious diseases.
been doing laundry. I should have been
You may be thinking this is more than you thought you signed up for when you decided to try to use social media in your organization!
Hans-Peter Schwarz - Drums
I love this team, absolutely love them. They roll 10 deep and play great team basketball. They don’t lean on any one player too much, so any guy can be their lead scorer any night and even if Danny Granger is cold, they can win. But this team is still a couple years away from being a title contender. They simply do not have that one player who can take over at the ends of games. Every other team ahead of them has what they don’t: a player who will take over in the fourth quarter and carry them to wins. Until they have that superstar, they will continue to simply be a good team, nothing more.
Layla of Blue Abaya recently wrote a very engaging, entertaining, and endearing minute-by-minute post about her first huge Saudi Wedding Extravaganza. I found myself laughing out loud at some of her descriptions of the evening's events.
I heard some creature bark.
Haven’t been there in August. Will see if there is time during the weekends. Enjoy the pictures!
I wish I were more into Valentine's day in terms of decorating, romantic stuff, etc., but I've never really embraced the "holiday" that much. Even so, I thought I'd post a few pics I came across that I just LOVE, and think they relate beautifully to this little Heart Day without being too predictable.
i can’t call you yet, because it is too early. i’m sure you are sleeping and must have work today so i wouldn’t dare. also, i know you would jump right out of bed and come over to talk me out of it. so i will just wait. i’ll still remember the promise i made to you. i’ll give you the chance to talk me out of it.
Platform: Windows & Linux (although, they do have an updated Windows version available in Beta)
In a society with a largely non-literate population like ancient Greece, values and ideals not communicated by oral tradition are quickly forgotten. Poets and oracles transmitted cultural wisdom that functioned as social cement. The function of poetic truth was cultural mnemonics – it held society together.
Kraft card and white card
I'm very lucky that I work from home. I love the solitude; I adore setting my own schedule; and I get more work done in one day than I did in a month at the office (not really, in case any former bosses are reading this!).
entrepreneurs
This whole R.A.K business, however, is a gift that also comes with a price- you gotta pay it forward.
We skyped with the girls and now it's time to spend our last night in mainland China. It's a little bittersweet. We have very much enjoyed our time in China but we are also anxious to see our big girls!! We also can't wait for all of you to meet this precious little girl that has captured our hearts!!
When you lose something you can’t replace
Results: They just cannot do without him Friday May 13.
*Come on, I have a lot on my plate...
Hello all you wonderfully creative peeps.
Size: 117, 70 Mb
The Emperor needed a new enemy to regain the support of his pseudo-slaves. He hated Christians, because the Christians publicly condemned his ritual sacrifices. So he gradually started persecuting them. Diocletian's vice-emperor, Galerius, didn't have a hard time in persuading him that if a Palace were just to burn down, Diocletian could really accelerate his crusade against the Christians. Just by coincidence, twice within sixteen days toward the end of February, Diocletian's palace in Nicomedia burned. The Christians were immediately blamed.
Therefore judge not before the time: until the Lord come, who both will bring to light, &c. He will reveal the thoughts and actions of men that lie hid in darkness. He means, then, that to God alone are naked and open the hidden things of man, his intentions, his secret motives, and the depths of his heart, which is to him like a bottomless sea, and therefore that none but God sees man’s justification. None, therefore, save God should judge another, or even himself, for his faith, his works, or the grace of Christ. For we often think that we are doing right when we are acting amiss: we often suppose that we are led by the grace of Christ, and act out of love for Him, when all the time we are impelled by our own lust or by the love of our own fame. Cf. Chrysostom and Ambrose and S. Jerome ( Dial. 2 contra Pelag.). S. Augustine, too, has some beautiful remarks on this point in his sermon on Ps. 42., where he says that the deep of human misery and blindness calls to the deep of Divine mercy and illumination.
Good thing I've had a lot of practice in the patience department...
I worked all day by myself in the workshop near Abergavenny, going in for breaks and cuppas!
Let's try to get abroad from anticipation a game's bulk by its length, and instead by our all-embracing amusement of it, and how agog we'd be to play it through again. Afterwards all, New Air-conditioned Mario Bros. Wii may abandoned yield about 5-6 hours to beat, but that hasn't chock-full me from accepting added than $50 annual of fun out of it.
It was an accident. I was going from memory, which obviously told me wrong, while making nut milk yesterday. Not only was I wrong, but I made a complete mess while trying to squeeze every bit out of that nut milk bag, too. Cashew milk was running down my arm and all over one of the counters.
However, my author has been wondering why there were not more entries… she says surely not everyone has been spending their entire summer holiday chained to a desk like the poor unicorn? Well, I could have told her! Obviously if someone has already read the book in order to give it a review, they might not want that exact same book as a prize... duh. So I’ve given her a prod with my sparkly horn, and she has agreed to extend the competition to make it a bit more appealing.
Scott’s Liquid Gold Wood Cleaner & Preservative $1.50/1
1888 The birth of Walter Tull, professional football for Tottenham Hotspur and Northampton Town. He was the first Afro-Caribbean / mixed heritage outfield player in the top division of English football, and the first to be commissioned as an infantry officer in the British Army. Northampton South MP Brian Binley has campaigned for Tull to be posthumously awarded the Military Cross for his ‘gallantry and coolness’ while leading his company of 26 men on a raiding party into enemy territory during World War I.
Those are the most awesome words I’ve ever heard. And they’re from a self-ascribed Idiot. 2004 World Series Champs, yeah, baby! It about sums up what everyone’s aim in life should be. When everything seems hopeless, when the odds are stacked against you, there’s always something to fight for, there’s still a reason to hope and believe and to give the battle your all.
SCOTT PARKER (Tottenham): The English midfielder has had an incredible season, the highlight of which saw him captain the England National Team. He’s been phenomenal for Tottenham all year after setting in quickly after his transfer from West Ham last summer. His never-say-die attitude and his untiring engine have been a blessing to Tottenham this season.
It’s been a bit difficult to blog recently, mainly because my mind is preoccupied with so many things at once (work, studies & life). Look, most of them I certainly can handle myself. But this topic kind of bogs my mind so I thought I could get some insight from anyone who would care to share and post comments below so maybe we can pass this “knowledge” on to others.
We were having one of those deep philosophical discussions about useless people. Both of us interjected the somber conversation with lightning quick, light-hearted wit, and a sense of hope for the future.
Unknown until some potent thing
That's right, I'm bigging up the local beers this year. Hill Island are one of the slightly newer breweries on the North East scene, but it was only recently that I discovered this Durham based micro. The beer itself, like many other Hill Island beers is simple, well composed and sessionable.
All-in-all, the book isn't terrible, but it isn't amazing. Anderson's prose is, I guess, the Asimovian "clear-as-glass" style that so many modern fantasists and science-fiction writers employ. The overall effect is alright, but nothing to write home about. Holger is a pretty consistent character--his earthly experiences have certainly tainted his view of life and events in the fantasy realm in which he finds himself. He's torn between his earthly pragmatism and scientific skepticism as an engineer, and the faith and religiosity of the crusading knight. I can see how he was Gygax's inspiration for the paladin class (people ask him to lay hands on them, for example), but Holger's "lawful" behavior is a product of his earthly training in scientific methodology, not any sort of theological certainty. Indeed, Holger never struck me as a very faithful and virtuous character--just a man who was trying to get home. His courage and bravery, as well as his moral fiber, aren't the stuff of legend, but much more earthy and practical--this makes Anderson's story quite enjoyable and a tad subversive, but again, I see some strain between Holger's character and the paladin of Gygax and Arneson's D&D. Holger's no saint--he's horny and he is a tad unscrupulous, but overall he's honest and a definite do-gooder.
Sennheiser Ie7 Review
That night over dinner my nerves went into overdrive.
I wish I had something wise and profound to write about tonight, but I'm just too tired. And the baby is crying. Something about teeth coming in...and why do both girls have to teeth at once? Every time? It just doesn't seem right.
7. Prefer getting or giving presents? There’s much more satisfaction in giving the gifts. I often make custom cards, and have such a great time making personalized gift bags. Not gonna lie – I love receiving ‘em too.
As I was preparing myself for an intense reading session for my Contemporary Issues class, I got a little sidetracked and decided to scan my news feed for some exciting gossip, maybe some interesting life updates, but instead, this is what I found:
Iron Witch
The unfolding consequence behind Republican and Democratic rhetoric is the misuse of the people’s hardships, by formulating issues in such a way that obscures the reality of our national challenges and undermines compromise between the parties. As each party seeks to label the other as radical, the Democrats as socialists and the Republicans as Social Darwinists, they succeed only in constructing and perpetuating oppositional, fabricated, and self-fulfilling radicalized realities.
There is nothing at all shameful about being a “nerd”– although, caring about your grades does not make you a “nerd.” Whoever says otherwise is just intimidated because they think you are smarter than them. And they’re probably right about that.
For the blogfest, we need to pick a favorite character we've created and explain why we love her. Our character is named Six and we picked her because she's a mixture between blood-red lipstick and batshit insane. Oh, and she's also Death. That part's kind of important.
The lumpy ingredients, now sadly deminished.
How to get better history
We see from this vantage point many transformations taking place within the hearts of a greater number of Humanity than ever before.
Having spoken to a loved one today, this got me thinking as it sometimes feel as though everything I have seen I’d like to see again, but also to simply create new memories right now.
We had a great morning opening gifts at my mom's and enjoyed a fantastic breakfast of bacon, eggs, and homemade cinnamon rolls. The kids were in heaven! Thankfully, in the midst of all the house and plumbing craziness, I was able to get all my Christmas food prepped at mom's and ready to take to Jason's parents for the big meal later in the day.
-What level of ULS do you use (elementary, intermediate, middle school, high school, transition)? I use the intermediate level. My students are mostly middle school aged now, but when I started using the curriculum (with the same group of students) they were intermediate age. I think I could change my subscription level, but the intermediate level still works and is appropriate for my students so I haven't bothered to check into that.
Edwards, Denis - MIRAMAR MORNING
Back then there were less than ten websites on “infant potty training”, or “elimination communication” as it is clunkily called. Now there are hundreds of thousands of websites and youtube videos. But still it hasn’t caught on. If I believed in conspiracies I would think that the global polluters Huggies and Pampers were suppressing the knowledge that babies of three months or younger don’t need nappies.
I hunger for your sleek laugh, the words soaked in whiskey. They intoxicate and make me swoon even though we don’t talk love. There is a lot I listen to in between the spaces of our conversation. When you talk fast I know there are millions of things unsaid swirling in a whirlpool inside your heart. Trying hard to get past the mundane trivialities of daily struggle to live, yearning to come out. I know many times you do not really say what you are saying and can’t say what you did not. When you stop, I know you curse for messing it up and I smile even though it leaves me burning with want of you. I wonder if I will ever touch you ,but with these words.
Well I had to do this post early in the morning, so I can't share my day.
I could tell by looking at Wendy that she was frustrated by her answer. I felt her pain. Changing our own lingo is so hard. Taking the new language and translating it into Kid-talk…so frustrating.
On Saturday, I spent twenty minutes at North Melbourne Arts House with Il Pixel Rosso's And the Birds Fell from the Sky. Described as an "immersive video-goggle experience", this show combines "instructional theatre" with the so-hot-right-now immersive theatre experience, to create a futuristic fantasy involving the audient in an post-apocalyptic mythos involving, well, clowns.
In foam and flame at Trafalgar, on Albuera plains,
Until I caught a glimpse of it again during a slumber party in 7th grade.
Yesterday I halfheartedly looked for hot sauce and couldn't find any, so I started to write it down on our grocery list before we sat down at the table.
So, this morning as I was on the web, I found this so cute and easy scarfe called "speghetti scarfe". I found an old tee shirt that I didn't realize wasn't old but belonged to Michelle, the daughter of Mary. Oh well, I was going to give it to
So what am I doing here? Well, not long after Karen posted that particular comment to my blog, I contacted her, not only to thank her, but ask her to collaborate with me on a project that I was calling Seven Shadows Week – a week-long tribute to seven film noir films – films that were in the 1001 Movies You Must See Before You Die book and films that I’d yet to check out. I figured she’d blow me off. I mean, let’s face it, why would this expert on the subject want anything to do with a little ol’ blog like mine? When she messaged me back, I realized it was quite the contrary. Her enthusiasm to participate in my project was mind blowing to me and since that day I’ve realized what a truly genuine and personable lady Karen really was. Unfortunately, every once and a while I have to step away from the cinema scene and recharge my batteries, and what was now OUR project was put on the back burner. But, I’ve since returned and we’re ready to present Seven Shadows Week, something we really hope you’ll enjoy and something that we’d like to present with both of our viewpoints intact.
Our house faces east. Not ideal. It has a verandah at the front and back (love, but dark!). The front of the house gets amazing morning sunshine and is light all day (especially light when Tim takes the pictures).
The listening that must be a vital part of the financial abundance that you desire is the listening to your inner self.
... she said it was very inspirational...
If you can’t make it to the festival but will be headed to GABF this year, we’ll have the Collaboration Beer available at the Texas Craft Brewers Guild booth.
Sitting here each day I wonder …
If your agent is showing the house to a potential buyer, find something to do so you are not at home. A buyer won’t feel as comfortable if you are there. With you in the immediate picture, it will be harder for potential buyers to imagine themselves living in the home. This could have an end result of losing that buyer.
Here’s a basic truth: The world will not make it easier for you to succeed. The path isn’t laid out for you, so you can’t expect stellar results with half-baked efforts. As a wise man once said, “Do or do not. There is no try.” Life has a way of dealing in absolutes, especially when it comes to making a name for yourself. Never assume that you just have to show up and everything will follow. Nobody got to where they are without shedding blood, sweat and tears.
We went to see the Cardinals game that evening. They played the Cubs and unfortunately lost by 1 point. It was still a lot of fun though!
~ Eli continues to try and be sneaky. He loves to try and steal drinks of my soda. For some reason he thinks if he moves really slowly I can't see what he's doing.
Ignoring the fact that he really expected me to drive everyone to Six Flags, I pretty much flipped out once again about how I try not to set foot in any amusement park if I could help it. It's not that I hate the place, I have no reason to pay for a ticket when I know I'm not going to ride any rides. And no it's not because I'm scared of the rides. It's because I know the kinds of people who run them, that's what I'm afraid of. The punk ass 16 and 18 year old there fore their summer jobs with minimum training and limited knowledge of safety procedures. I was one of those kids only a few years ago, I wouldn't even trust my past self to run any ride now. After two years of being a so called "Carnie" it can do without it.
The WORLD says… Wealth and possessions are mine to enjoy because I earned them.
I dont think my waist line will ever recover!
Let's hear it for Vogue Australia! This is the publication I credit with fuelling a lifelong addiction to glossy magazines. My first forays into reading about fashion started at the tender age of thirteen when I used to borrow copies from my local library, to later pore over them with my sister and girlfriends in a gaggle of collective girlish glee - oh the clothes! However I also remember wonderful articles, sharp writing and captivating short stories that stayed with me for ages after I reluctantly returned them by their due dates. When I go home I always reacquaint myself by getting a current edition for the beach and am never disappointed to find that it is just how I remember it - that is, a bloody good read.
When they finally got out of the water someone suggested we go for a hike. I was happy to do anything that didn't involve my children swimming in water that MAY contain crocodiles. So off we set - climbing up a mountain over rocks in scorching heat with flies buzzing everywhere.
I picked up my phone to make a call today and there was a telemarketer on the line. Oh how convenient for them (lol). Today I had a call from the same Washington DC # every 15 minutes for an hour. I know it's someone's job but honestly do they realize how annoying their calls are???
“My Dad lived a consultant, and so informed his decision to have me into the same line as his.”
We were living in a dumpy half basement suite in Calgary, I returned to dancing after Emma was 2 months old.
Note what kinds of conflicts would arise in each period of Korea's tumultuous history, and how the conservatives and progressives would be formed along those lines of the conflicts. Korea's conservatives essentially belong to the big umbrella created by the three-party merger. Within it, there is an uneasy coexistence between the beneficiaries of the former dictatorship and former pro-democracy activists who are nonetheless conservative. The leading conservative party of today -- New Frontier Party, or NFP -- is strong in southeastern parts of Korea, as Gyeongsang-do natives Park Chung-Hee and Chun Doo-Hwan prioritized their home region for economic development. Conservatives are pro-United States, the patron state of South Korea even through its dictatorship period. Conservatives are hawkish against North Korea, and usually do not hesitate to accuse the progressives as North Korean fifth column.
If you just Google "Irish Literature" or "Irish Short Stories" you will find lots of ideas.
They looked at whether doodling improved or hindered attention to the primary task at hand, such as answering questions on a telephone or taking notes during a lecture.
Every day we have been telling Baby Jay that he would be following his sister and gu-gu (Big J's sister) home. I not sure he understand or not, but sometimes I feel that he knows what we are talking about. He would say "no, no, no" when we told him that he is going back for holiday. Sigh!
OK. That made me feel a little better.
Does anyone have a HP printer that gives you a paper mismatch error all the time. I am about to throw this silly printer right out the window! Ugggg--I have been working on wedding invites and have NOTHING but problems with this silly printer! I have spent hours and hours trying to figure it out. The weird thing is that every now and then I think it is fixed because it will print one and then it goes right back to the error message. As far as I can figure it is because of some silly sensor that is malfunctioning! Oh well, sorry for the rant. I have so many cards I want to share this week but haven't been able to get them posted so I am taking a break from the invites to post one now!
In the past few weeks I've contemplated whether or not to keep this blog going or to just shut it down. No big "life changing" event has taken place.I just feel like shifting gears from where I've gone with this site so far. The biggest question that I've kept asking myself is this, "Would I feel comfortable giving this URL to everyone I know?" And trust me, it didn't take much effort on my part to quickly answer with a "Not bloody likely!" Sure, my wife, mom, and one brother read it. A few other extended family members read it from time to time and a couple of "real life" friends stop by on occasion, but that's far from everyone I know.
I don’t know… I feel bad for talking like that about her, and it’s her business, and her body, not mine. What do you guys think? Do you push yourself to your limits when you exercise, or do you prefer to go a little easier (and if so then why)? I’d like to see the opinions of others, and see if I’m the weird one here haha.
I mean, it's not like I need buttery smooth, highly-pigmented, long-wearing eyeshadows that come in an wide array of colours.
Let me be very clear: those clients are amafuckingteurs. I am not most clients, however, so I can give you the proper juice:
- Gil
Cardigan (Club Monaco, consignment), knit top (Planet), skirt (Le Chateau), shoes (Feet First, thrifted), leather cuff (Guess, thrifted), wrist-wrap (Club Monaco), necklace (Raven's Rest Studio).
In my time I have also experienced the classic front desk mistake which always happens to at least one of the crew on any shoot I have been on. The double booking. You check in, take the lift 6 floors up, trot down a maze of corridors following signs for your room, (inevitably the last on the corridor), slip you keycard in the slot, open the door and find someone else's luggage in your room. Last year on a Children's show I worked on this was a weekly occurrence for most of the team and it was always the monday morning joke of whose room you had gone into the night before. The Presenter managed to walk in on the director asleep about three times.
As well as the conflicts due to the war, and personal conflicts between the characters, there is also an interesting look at conflicts arising from social conventions. Matilda is the most striking example; a ruler is expected to be stern, a woman is supposed to be soft and pliant, a contradiction in terms that causes difficulties for Matilda at every turn. Adeliza’s agonised yearning for a child during her barren marriage to Henry I is in part due to the pressure on a woman to fulfil her social duty of providing her husband with heirs, and part of her joy in the family she raises with her second husband Will d’Albini comes from being able to fulfil the expected role of mother as well as wife. Social expectations can weigh just as heavily on a man, as shown by Brian FitzCount who (as portrayed here) is a warrior by expectation and a scholar by temperament, and pays a heavy emotional price for that conflict (among others).
So, the next time that you fail at something, especially if it is in your walk with God, remember that He is perfect so that those who follow him never have to be while still on this Earth. Be blessed that you have the ability to know what failure is, but how sweet redemption will be in the end of all things. If our God is for us, then there is no defeat, and no loss. There is only triumph!
Since it wasn't easy for a non-native English speaker like my daughter to memorize all of the above, I found "Schoolhouse Rock" videos from youtube that help explain the above in song form. We made up a rap song called "RAPPS" -- for the 5 freedoms in the first amendement, "Religion, Assembly, Press, Petition and Speech"
Kasztner started out very confident, but the trial did not go in his favour. The judge ultimately ruled that he had “made a deal with the devil” in cooperating with Eichmann, saying that “one can not save one man’s life at the expense of another.” The Israeli Supreme court overturned his ruling in 1955 in a 4-1 vote.
Blog Tour Schedule
RR: Your band just added a new member recently, a drummer. What led to finding a new drummer and how did you find him?
Place a baking sheet in the oven and preheat the oven to 400 degrees. Once preheated, toss the Brussels sprouts with salt and pepper then place the open halves directly on the hot pan. Remove a few of the outer leaves and scatter across the pan. Roast for approximately 15 minutes, peeking in every few minutes to remove any leaves that are crisping up.
You’ve got to admire Beyonce … The woman rocks out arenas for two hours straight, night after night, wearing ridiculously high heels. That’s got to hurt. If it was me, I’d be guzzling painkillers the whole night through. It’s bad enough when you hit the club on a Saturday night. It’s not long before you start scanning the venue for a comfy seat, or even resort to kicking off your stilettos to go barefoot. Foot ache can start to nag like tooth ache very quickly. Unfortunately.
There is so much going on it is a job to know where to start.
"Time honoured creeds and ancient faith,
don’t let these waves wash away your hopes
HEM : position in the celestial sphere :
I did this by filling not one, but two glasses of water and putting them in the fridge to cool off. Nothing helps me cool down as much as cold water INSIDE OF ME, except for maybe getting into a pool of cold water. Since that won’t happen (although there is a cold shower after the workout in my future), I’m doing all that I can.
We also took the winding road up Mt. Scott, the second highest peak in the range. I was absolutely terrified driving the car, thinking that at any moment I'd suddenly go insane and rev the car off the road and make us plummet to our deaths (I hate 6' ladders, mind you). My wife scoffed. But once our ears popped and we made it to the top, she was scared to climb the rocks and peer down, whereas I felt like a little boy, giddy as I hopped large boulders in a single bound. I'm a prairie boy, so it was a whole new plain of existence (get it? huh?).
stood by me throughout everything. All of the ups and deep downs. They
That said, do not fear, we are nowhere close to turning TV back on...
It doesn’t have to be this way. Corporations can take a cut while still making significant profits and share the wealth with farmers and farmworkers.. If each American family paid $16 more dollars a year -that went straight to workers- it could double the wages of farmworkers, which would get them closer to a living wage. Change is possible. If you want to get educated, join SAF’s listserve by contacting me at nadeen.bir_ at duke dot edu. If you’re ready to take action, come to:
I can see past the fake tits, and plastic dicks
Sea Salt Soap is a delightful mix of shea butter, olive oil and coconut with the added benefits of salt. The bar is rich and creamy and lots of sudsing. It is a favorite among their customers that suffer from eczema as well as teens with acne.
Those interested should bring their PC tower and any software disks that they may have in the event your computer needs to be cleaned and software reinstalled. There will be antivirus and spyware software provided. This is a free service to members of the Lafayette community and Brooklyn at large. For more information contact TYree at 347-587-6443 or checkout IGOTITOO.
“There is a time, when the community as a whole, their needs are better than the individual and, I think, more important,” says Snyderman.
And there has been this transfer of wealth. So, if we could stop all of these transfers to the wealthy class, but the solution isn’t to tax the wealthy. If you give an honest product and customers buy that product, you deserve to keep that money and earn that money. But there’s a big difference between those who earn money and those who rip us off through the government and the monetary system.
● Eliminates the need to make monthly mortgage payments
Just another piece of an increasingly clear picture that's been evident ever since Barack Obama's relationship with people like Edward Said, Jeremiah Wright, Khalid al-Mansour, Al Sharpton, Louis Farakhan, Bill Ayers and Rashid Khalidi was revealed back when he was candidate Obama..to those who were willing to open their eyes and look at it.
Supporting characters don't have to have as many 'yes' answers. But they do have to be unique, and there has to be a reason for them to be there. When doing a character worksheet for a supporting character, I especially want to ask myself if she:
Once again, it was time to take the Tea. For many of the others, it was obvious that the drink was truly disgusting and difficult to get down. For me, however, it was about the same as last night – not really that bad. I think holding my nose helps and just getting it on down quickly, but I had no trouble ingesting it or keeping it down. Just lucky, I think. Others have told me that I should not assume it will always be so easy.
Between Kevin finishing finals and me trying to finish Mad Men on Netflix, we haven't had time to cook at home lately. I've been looking for any excuse to celebrate and eat out, so this is my "You just finished your third-to-last class ever!" outfit.
This last week has been pretty busy - just the normal things though! We've started the "No Flour, No Sugar" diet and it's getting better. It's not really a diet in my mind - just a eating style change. We're trying it out for two weeks or one month to see how our bodies react. I didn't realize there is a form of sugar in practically EVERYTHING? Check it out next time you're at the store, I dare you.
By: Kevin Thurman
29. Paint cabinets in dining room (FREE)
The greatest part of beer history in Cincinnati is that there are miles and miles of underground Lager tunnels underneath the city. The Germans brought there Lager beer with them from home, which has a sweeter taste and had a wider spread appeal and changed the landscape of beer in America forever.
performing live.
6. Filtered water eliminates slimy bacteria build-up.
I owe some thanks to Cori, who explained dreamspell to me. She’s also an avid cyclist, and DJ. She is definitely adept at the spinning of cycles. Hi Cori! As I was getting a grip on these Maya cycles within cycles of time, she mentioned in passing that she found that bicyclists had an easier time picking this stuff up than others. This has stayed with me, somewhere in the back of the vast space inside my skull, and hence this post.
Greg Walton: “As far as consequences go I just don’t know we will see once are principal gets there tommorrow as far as I know he can cancel the talent show and cultural awareness.”
dtr = double triple crochet and dtrc = double triple crochet
¼ cup apple cider vinegar
It was beginning to look as though the sunset shoot at Delicate Arch would pretty much turn out to be a repeat of this morning’s disappointing episode at Mesa Arch. “I might as well hike up there anyway,” I thought to myself. “What have I got to lose?”
Spread the sauce over tortilla, sprinkle some cheese over, add in the fillings and sprinkle another layer of cheese again. Bake in a preheated oven at 200C till cheese has melted and tortilla is slightly crispy, around 6-8 minutes.
How I still can feel your kiss
Your party guests will have worked up an appetite by this point. The birthday Amazon Princess can now lead them to the feast table.
However, the secret to happiness is not “if only”, but “today I have”. Enjoy what you have today.
Which tells me they are simply wonderful kitchens!
Anyway, I used a mini-stamp by Basic Grey that Angela gave me a few years ago. It does not have a name, and is no longer available as far as I know. It is a really cute stamp, though, and seemed to fit this particular card. I also used a Stampin' Up stamp from the Eat Chocolate set. I used Memento ink with Cryogen cardstock for the little girl, and SU cardstock with SU ink for the sentiment. For paper, I used My Mind's Eye Lost & Found Two "Rosy" designer paper, and SU cardstock. To create the doilies and frame, I used dies from Cheery Lynn: Italian Flourish, Nautical Wheeler, and Square Lace Frame. I also used Spellbinders' Nestabilities Circle dies. I accented the image with a Signo Uniball white gel ink pen and some Glossy Accents on her eyes
Four team personnel were injured in the incident and subsequently taken to the medical centre. Three are now receiving treatment at local hospitals for their injuries, while the fourth has been released. The team will monitor their condition and ensure they receive the best possible care.
I did make an amazing Vegan dinner for my housemates, and they loved it! And they aren’t raving hippie, muesli munching veggies – all meat eaters!
Brooklyn’s session is—
The province is under investigation for 710 incidents of fraud, 138 incidents involving supply-chain management and 255 other incidents of financial misconduct.
No Pw
Get the stock ready at this point. Heat it up if using pre-made stock, or if using stock cubes, add boiling water to about 1 beef bouillon cube, dissolve and keep ready.
Hello there! First let me say that I am a big fan of your blog! I am not always the most organized person (lol, my husband would probably say that is an understatement) but reading your blog keeps me motivated and inspired to keep trying. I love that your projects are pretty, inspiring, AND functional. That's a rare combo!
10. Whip It
A note on the yarn, Ella Rae Classic Solids: I really enjoyed working with this yarn, I actually vastly prefer it to Cascade 220. It had a great feel and texture to it, it was processed very well.
Change of control
I can see the headlines over the next few days. "Too fat? Drink wine." "Wine: The Wonderful Fat Reducing Drink." And so on.
The man was so perfect there was no room for improvement.
Cordless electric mowers are a very good choice for your lawn care wants for several factors. Everyone today is extra environmentally conscious and are actively discovering methods to lower their footprint on the environment. Since electric mowers don’t run on gasoline you don’t have the exhaust output of classic mowers.
I'm back. It's been a long month, a very long month. A month filled with work, moving and graduation. The first two were nowhere near as fantastic as the last! Even though I haven't posted I have been writing. And reading.
“Closing down the background check system, and thus suspending all firearms transactions and concealed carry license processing simply allows the Pennsylvania State Police to obstruct the gun rights of law-abiding citizens,” said CCRKBA Chairman Alan M. Gottlieb. “We are not reassured by a promise from the agency that it will expedite this computer system update in order to restore service as soon as possible. Access to the computers for background checks should not be suspended at all.
suspend in hesitations
EDL for life
We all need physical contact--numerous studies have proved that, and common sense confirms it to be true.
76) You’re daddy must be a hunter because he sure caught a fox!
And that, my friends, simply has to change.
Such a cutie!
My wife shared it. I shared it. I encouraged others to share it. I took a copy of the photo to a music discussion site and shared it there, which got a very lively “national debate” going with all but one or two people showing wonderful support and understanding for Lester. Check out Lester’s Facebook timeline and you’ll see tons of support for him there too, although comments on the photo itself are a bit mixed with a large majority still seeming to support Lester’s campaign. And I can tell you that his phone at his home is ringing off the hook, people all over the country are wanting to set up times to work on documentaries, etc.
However, O’Donnell said previous interviews, mostly with network TV morning show hosts, have been too soft on Mr Sonner — who has mostly refused to give specific details about the case.
Nearby Nowon is a long freeway that connects the rest of Seoul to this Northeastern portion. It is called the Dongbu Expressway, and is notorious for being slow. It runs parallel next to a river, and I recall the times when I would ride with my ex, how the scenery was pleasant to watch.
A Cloche!....Sort of....
Dr. Strange is pretty entertaining in this one too, even though he spends most of the story captured. But he makes a pretty good straight man for Ben Grimm. I need to keep an eye out for Starlin's Hulk/Thing graphic novel with Bernie Wrightson.
is spending it.
2.Nail Polish Diet: Paint your nails when you feel like eating.
I never spend a huge amount on any of these items; I think part of the fun is sourcing a bargain. I find it helpful to lay out my supplies for inspiration and sometimes, I can actually bring myself to use them! Anyway, I thought I'd share a few photos of my craft stash for those who are interested:
2 ) Shape-Shifting Robot Blob
Our tour begins here, at the start of TEMPLE AVENUE, the main thoroughfare of Godsend; or, as it is better known, The City of Bones. To the North is the TEMPLE QUARTER, crammed full of temples, churches, shrines, and the homes of the clergy. Any god you care to mention, well-known or obscure, has someplace of worship in that quarter; and below lies the extensive network of catacombs and crypts that attract many a treasure hunter. Not that I'd advise you to have a go yourself; aside from the disapproving clergy, there're things down there that'd rip your face off, before you even realised you where in danger.
Ooi said he had not been able to contact Razali.
We all have tough days. You know... those days when multiple issues hit you all at once and cause a storm of stress, aggravation and yes.. maybe even anger. Well yesterday was one of those days for me.
Then came the issue of pricing. I was on pins and needles to hear the quote, because after pricing out the previous bakeries, I was starting to realize how incredibly expensive wedding cakes can be! However, I was incredibly surprised (in a good way!)! Nomeda charges a very reasonable price per serving for her cakes, and she DOESN'T charge any extra fees for her design work. SCORE! On the way home from our meeting, my mom and I stopped by Publix to price out the same size of cake, just for a comparison. Guess what...the same size cake at Publix would have been around $100 more (and you have to select your design from a book)! I couldn't believe it.
Storyline: 5/5 - The innovation and originality is so admirable. Although there is the base concept of afterlife and death gods, Kubo Tite has literally created a new world through manga. I feel that Bleach is the perfect demonstration of Kubo-sensei’s ingeniousness. Again, action packed but behind that, lies deeper themes and messages. Each character and each verse written in the manga has their own purpose and conveys a certain message.
If you climb on top of non-existant.
The Indigency Program applies only to individuals living at or below 125% of the federal poverty guidelines as defined by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (see chart below). The Indigency Program reduction does not apply to any other fees besides surcharges that a driver may owe DPS.
And cut. That’s a wrap ladies and gentlemen so wrap it up and I’ll have it to go. On the go on the go going to be gone on the go kind of going. Now we spoon?
Bhakti Yoga has great vast implications which can change ones life, completely transforming ones whole self. This transformation does not come through blind acceptance of what I will say to you, but through greater understanding and personal realization. To practice any other path of yoga one must express Bhakti, either in practicing other paths Bhakti comes about or it is the chosen path. The Great Ones reminded all people, wisdom can lead one to Bhakti or Bhakti can lead one to wisdom. However, the question remains, what is it about Bhakti that is not obvious, intellectually speaking? The path of Bhakti brings Acceptance first through tolerance, understanding, peace, and most of all, love of all, that’s just to name a few of the attributes. We do have many clear examples of such beings to look at.
Next you write out a small list of things to help you achieve this winning outcome. For me the list looks like this:
I love that picture...
I put these in the slow cooker.
Has it become a banana republic where unelected feudal people rule the roost?
The baby is doing great and just as cute as can be! Logan took great care of her while I was gone.
After students are sufficiently frustrated, stop them and ask how the storytelling went. Talk about the things that were happening and how it made them feel. I make sure to tell the students that the activity is not a punishment, I just realized that maybe they didn't know what it is like to try to convey information and not have a good listener. Call it forced empathy. Then I have a short, but candid conversation, where I tell them how it makes me feel when I work really hard to plan lessons that I think are important and will be fun for them and have students being disrespectful and not listening. I may play up the hurt feelings just a bit with my younger classes.
Kathleen Peacock's thrilling novel is the first in the Hemlock trilogy, a spell-binding urban fantasy series filled with provocative questions about prejudice, trust, lies, and love.
Having a weapon in school, meant being caught with a catapult.
Totally YUMMY right? I want to move in. Stat. Hear that Elsa? Get ready for a roomate! Can I bring my crazy kids too? Of course I have a complete weakness for office spaces!
Wine tasting client events have gained traction. They’re enjoyable, profitable and a great way to tie in top client relationships while meeting new potential clients. Over the past year I’ve been hearing more-and-more about elite advisors employing these into a marketing plan. Because thinking about the wine drinkers…aren’t they probably part of your ideal target market?
Yes, that's it. Change it back!
There are those who love taking good pictures and then there are those who just love good pictures. As many of us would know, taking a professional-looking picture can be quite a daunting task. For those who would looking to take great pictures without the hassle of hundreds of custom settings, consider getting your hands of the Canon Powershot SX10IS 10MP digital camera.
We spent yesterday brunching in Champaign with our friends, driving the long, flat road back to Chicago, and hanging out with my parents and brother.
Dang. Smith must’ve told her about this gig and what to look for when I’m not really trying. I should cast more spells in front of a mirror to see what I really look like.
Chair: I am getting galled. We have covered this at some considerable length.
My suggestion here is to read the labels as the brands vary so much but if you have the time and energy the following is an option:
I carried the offending carton of warm chocolate milk inside and went to pour it down the sink. However it didn't pour. Chunks of brown, cottage cheese looking, spoiled, nastiness plopped out of the carton. (I might add here that I'm extremely proud of myself for not throwing up, although I'm feeling a little queasy just remembering the scene.)
I apologized to her about the noise, as I'm sure it can't be easy living below us. She said it was actually a pleasure for her to hear little feet running overhead. It reminded her of growing up with eight brothers, and of her large family full of nieces and nephews. She told me to let the kids run around the house without worry because it brings her great joy.
No, I haven’t changed jobs, but I have changed location. And it turns out that South Shropshire is a great spot for music and all sorts of bookishness with a community bias, so I have every intention of taking advantage of it while I’m here.
p.s. I've been playing around on Spoonflower after taking a pattern design class from Nicole's classes and am having way too much fun. Have any of you ever used Spoonflower? I created a bunch of designs, but haven't ordered any fabric yet.
I was mostly ad-libbing this section. I wish I had made a list of names ahead of time, as I named one of the npc’s (a guardsman of the Dungeon Lord) Marcus. Sheesh. After Marcus I quickly jotted a few names down, Lucan among them. The party spoke to the Lord, who said they should leave, because he has seen too many inexperienced adventurers turned into piles of goo. He also says he protects his people, and offers them employment as guards or patrollers. They briefly consider, but the haste of their mission prohibits them and they decline. They finally make a skill challenge check – diplomacy, and the lord gives them direction to the hall of kings, the first landmark on the map.
My personal fingerprint on the Michigan’s Children’s Trust Fund Signature Auction is a take-home postcard that will be placed at every seat at the auction. These postcards feature stories from local councils and direct services that recieve funding from CTF. I took the stories from those at CTF who supplied me with them, and editted them for grammar, logic, and in order to fit a certain format. After editing, they were sent to the graphic designer, who put an image of a different kiddo on each. There is also a thank-you on the other side, encouraging attendees to take the card home. Well the finished PDF came today! they look great too! I can’t wait to send them to the printer. There were a couple errors, but they will be an easy fix for the designer. I hope everyone at the auction enjoys these endearing stories.
This week I hope to..
The three year bull market has run into some resistance lately as it tried to clear to SPX 1400 level. It ran into the same type of difficulty, to varying degrees, at 1100, 1200 and 1300. This is the normal progression of a bull market. Overall we continue to project a 2013 bull market target high between SPX 1545 and 1586. Since the market has already risen from SPX 667 in March 2009 to SPX 1422 in April 2012, most of the gains would appear to be behind us. Our objective now is to identify the significant waves as they unfold, and label them correctly, so that we can identify the actual high of this bull market.
Oh, and marking off one of my 2012 Goals as…..Done! Woo Hoo! Yay Me!
Cecily would give anything to leave Caernarvon and go home. Gwenhwyfar would give anything to see all the English leave.
We arrived in Shanghai last night! We had a bit of delay when we reached Seoul as we realized I was too sick to catch our next flight. For those who remember Scott carting me off in a wheelchair when we brought Beniam home... well, this was worse. Good times.
Anyway, here's your freebee for the day :) Click on the link below to go to my account to downlaod the PNG file, and leave some love if you like my work :) Thanks!
My oldest recollection of this effort is from my early days of swimming lessons. I think I was 7 or 8 and I was getting near the end of the ladder of courses. The old Red Cross system went from pre-beginner to senior badges with a tough course called “Survival” somewhere in the middle. The Survival level encompassed the skills required to survive in the event that you fell out of a boat, went swimming too far in a lake, were upside down in a canoe, and all of the things that you shouldn’t do. You swam with clothes on most of the time in order to simulate the difficulty you would face. It was a dose of reality in an otherwise fun activity. I love to swim and always have, but I did not enjoy this class. I had breezed through other levels of swimming and this was the first real challenge I had faced. At the end of 8 weeks we were all excited to get our report cards and our badges. When I was handed mine, I remember the shock and disbelief that swept over me when I opened it and there was no badge. NO BADGE….are you kidding me?!? I was devastated.
Kemnitius raises a railing objection based on these last words, that the Council of Trent was wrong in relying on this passage to prove that the Pope can give dispensation in the matter of vows and laws; for he says that a steward’s duty is not to relax laws but to distribute goods. I answer that the Council knew this very well; but that its argument was simply this: If the stewardship of the affairs of the Church has been intrusted to the Pope, therefore he can in certain cases, when there is need, dispense, that is, dissolve vows and oaths, and remit penances and the debt of temporal punishment, just as the steward of a household can, when the honour or profit of his lord demands it, make dispensations, grants, or remissions—for this belongs to the office intrusted to him; only he is bound to dispense rightly, not to squander thoughtlessly, as S. Bernard says (de Precep. et Disp., and de Consid. lib. iii.): “It is required in stewards that a man be found faithful. Where necessity urges it, a dispensation is excusable; where expedience calls for it, it is laudable. I mean, of course, expedience which makes for the common good, not that of the individual; for where neither of these exists, not only is a dispensation a breach of faith, it is a heartless act of squandering.”
911: What kind of vehicle is it and what color is it?
Students in J457, Advanced Editing, are writing guest posts for this blog this semester. This is the first of those posts. Settie Amini is a senior undergraduate at UNC-Chapel Hill’s School of Journalism and Mass Communication. When she is not wrangling with graphic design and multimedia projects, she spends her time as a fearless foodie and devoted reader of books. She is always looking for the next big (or little) adventure.
but standing up for them, fighting for them, understanding them
I am so very excited to make this announcement. I have been asked by Robyn, My Pink Stamper to be on her design team. I am excited to work with the rest of the design team. Tune in on Friday for our first blog hop.
Posted by ZeroTolerance at 1:27 AM 0 comments Links to this post
Kaffir Lime Leaves – 2 (hand-torn)
The scary-lookin' parrot is a K&Co sticker....I just left the backing on, so it would stay upright.....wouldn't want a drunken parrot, would we?.......come across too many of those in me time....heehee......
And if that fails
So … my turn to tag.
It is a good bet that your child knows what makes you angry, how to get you even more fired up, and in what ways you are likely to react. For a young being who feels so little control in life, imagine how powerful that must make him or her feel, knowing they can bring you to the boiling point without much effort on their part. Next, be aware of what your typical response to being angry is: are you the kind of person who says or does things to make other people feel bad when you’re angry? Are you likely to throw or kick things? Do you feel the need to discuss the event in minute detail at the time you and the other person are angry? Do you need to be alone, away from others when you are angry?
Why cannot some of you hear this message of Jesus, and now me? Because some of you are so full of fear, or pride, or timidity, some things that can take over the heart. We all have the things of life that trip us up. I was there, too. Some of you are filled with various addictions, trying to fill up what you think is the void within you. Once you give up these things, you will uncover the Kingdom of God is within you. Ask the Divine Creator to show you. He is a loving Father and wants to help you. But first you have to give up your fear, and give up your need to be right about the things you have believed so far. There is more.
Ouch and I think I deserved it.
Okay, easiest way to understand this category is the Machinima gameplay videos you can find on Youtube. Like, they speak while they play a game. I guess it’s the category I’m addicted to recently since so far I’ve watched the complete playthroughs for Persona 4 (since i have no ps2 T.T), Ryuu ga Gotoku series (or Yakuza in the western world), Catherine (ATLUS!!!) and Assassins Creed.
is that one indicates that the de facto stateless person is always at least a refugee, while the other one acknowledges that many individuals lack state protection in a way that falls short of outright persecution.
Come on out, we hope to see you there!!!
Attacks (Melee) - Obviously with no cost on range there is a slight difference you need to pick an even number of Good for the cost as you will do half that amount of bad. This time your to hit is slightly lower than range – you are closer so less chance to avoid the attack.
1. ruffly neutral top
You heard it here first.............
On the first day of seventh grade, Holly inherits her older sister’s power to hurt people by speaking curses out loud. First she curses theobnoxious boy who sits behind her in homeroom: temporary mouth sealant for Joshand sweet, sweet satisfaction for Holly. But now Josh wants to be a witchhunter, and Holly accidentally creates new victims every time she loses hertemper. If only she could shake Josh loose, nobody would suspect her. If onlyher sister hadn’t cursed Josh’s older brother with a permanently brokenkneecap, Josh wouldn’t be so close to the truth. Can Holly undo the damage herfamily has done?
August 2011 – May 2012 – current
We had another photo-shoot outside yesterday, and I pulled out the sheepskin that I am sure by now most are thinking -- what the hell is that fuzzy thing in all your photos? Well, it adds depth and it reminds me of feeling cozy and warm and safe. All things I find attractive and seem to come at a premium these days.
Oh hell seemed to whisper, "Just forget it, He's dead."
Keep in mind its about 100am CDT on April 30, 2012 …. a LOT of people are asleep and may not know possible tornadoes are coming. Which is why its always good to be prepared (middle of the night.. few minute warning.. you’ve got to know what to do and do it quickly).
-Had to go back to the hospital at a week and a half old for 2 days because of a staph infection. I would write more on that experience but I don't care to remember details, besides the yummy hospital food. I'm fine remembering that.
Microwave Melting: Place chocolate in a glass measuring cup or bowl. Microwave on HIGH for 30 seconds, stir and repeat until the chocolate is melted and smooth.
(Charlie trying to make his mark on every mailbox,
The first few minutes of this sequel are far more entertaining than the entirety of The Gingerdead Man. It's a montage that consists of footage from the first movie, narrated in the style of a fairy tale. It actually makes The Gingerdead Man look like a film worth watching. It even looks tolerable.
I told her, “Come on. We’ll go night night together.”
reaction occurs, it is important to notify a cosmetic
So as promised I have created a few freebies to share! Next Monday we are having our 'annual' Polar Express Day where the kids come in their PJs, we read the story that morning, then in the afternoon we surprise the kids by setting up the classroom like a train, give them train tickets and have them watch Polar Express on the big screen while sipping on hot chocolate! I'm so excited... last year one of my sweeties said "This is the BEST day of my life!" I got teary eyed after she said that. One of those moments that make you realize how you affect each of your students... =) Anywho... onto the freebies! I thought it would be fun for them to be able to bring something home to share with their families about their exciting day! (Well, besides the little bell that is hidden under their chairs! =) So I used scrappin doodle's clip art to create some sequencing activities and a little emergent reader to put together for each of the kiddos to share at home! =)
It was his child-like reaction at my question that intrigued me and made me want to know more,
Some people have argued that his ideas of anima/animus were sexist, since he was in essence saying "this makes you a boy, that makes you a girl." Interestingly enough, while his language reflects the fact that he was writing pre-feminist movement (everything is all he and his), he actually was arguing for equality between the sexes, since he was saying that emotionally, we are both male and female. And he never once argued that one gender was superior to the other.
What people do in their private lives is indeed their own business—but when a leader of a political party actively encourages and promotes such people (instead of expelling or distancing oneself from them, as any normal party leader would do), then you know that you are dealing with someone who has a severe psychological problem.
2-3 eggs
I loved this book! Mark Alders is a master storyteller when it comes to writing sci-fi and romance. I love how he’s able to take this reader into the imaginative and sometimes harsh worlds that he creates. His descriptive storytelling ability never fails to draw this reader into his creative tales and his sexy and unique characters always keep me enthralled with every adventure he throws their way.
Outfit 3) Inspired by Women's Health. I was looking through an issue of Women's Health while at the gym before work and I loved this outfit instantly. Then I realized I had the pieces to make this happen without spending a dime!﻿
Fresh out of medical school, handsome Stephen Gallagan is every woman’s idea of a catch. Trouble is, he’s not sure he wants a woman. Surrounded by predators in cocktail dresses, Stephen flees the Christmas party through the service corridor, running smack into Brendan. In the dark, in a tux, Stephen is a dead ringer for Kent.
Things are not perfect. He still growls at her, a lot, in the house. Sometimes I can figure out why (she approaches his den under the table, or when he is eating a treat) and sometimes I can't; the growls seem to be triggered by nothing more than her presence in his general vicinity.
Here is what i gathered.
debt consolidation reduction Or Bankruptcy?
One Fish....
OU: Presented the way it was recorded not altered at all. There is no good way to put Rain Song together without another source edited in.. Which doesn’t sound good to us. so enjoy the raw tapes
He inches closer, his face mere inches from mine. “All right, Soul Collector. It’s you and me then.”
-We elected to continue doing diapers at night for now, even though the plan recommends against it.
Like any journey, the first few days will be fine, any discomfort buried in the excitement of the new – plus we don’t tend to drink early in the week anyway, so who’s going to miss it?
This crisp was such a hit with everyone I've served it to. Son and Daughters both clamor for more and Son will sit down and enjoy this dessert like it's his last meal. I'm not so fond of giving Children tons of sugar as a way to make them eat, but somehow, watching Son enjoy this particular dessert really made me smile. He just loved it. He loved eating something that everyone was eating together. These sweet times, are really just that, sweet.
20.Rev. E.D. Campbell And Congregation / Come Let Us Eat Together
"Gawd, I am SO TIRED," he says.
Each is as despicable as the other.
B. ANY WHO TRY TO “WHIP ME UP” IN THEIR OWN SINFUL NATURE REACTIONS TOWARDS ME AND THE HOLY SPIRIT — will be SHUT OUT OF COMMUNICATION WITH ME. In other words, if YOU MOVE to TURN MY FOCUS AWAY FROM JESUS CHRIST AND THE WORD OF GOD AS I FOCUS ON SAME TO MANIFEST THE PRESENCE AND POWER OF GOD — you are “not helping”. YOU ARE IN A WRONG SPIRIT moving to deactivate the power of the Spirit as you attempt to REROUTE THE SPIRIT to your sinful nature — as you seek self-satisfaction in narcissistic reaction to the Holy Spirit. BE QUIET — or expect to be silenced in relation to me.
Our media pundits might insist that if average Americans ever realised the anarchist role in Occupy Wall Street, they would turn away in shock and horror; but our rulers seem, rather, to labour under a lingering fear that if any significant number of Americans do find out what anarchism really is, they might well decide that rulers of any sort are unnecessary.
I picked up two beers from Blatant Brewery in Massachusetts two weeks ago, and reviewed the Blatant Session here. I liked it, but I liked the Blatant IPA (6.5%) even more. The hops are firmly up-front, with an insistent pine-and-pith aroma and a captivating (and appetizing) bitterness on the tongue, and the whole of the beer trips lightly on the tongue, an agile dancer of an IPA that twirls and stamps. Delicious, and I wish I'd bought more.
The number one voted cake for this month was the zebra cake.
These include Crotch Crescent, Oxford; Titty Ho, Northamptonshire; Wetwang, East Yorkshire; Slutshole Lane, Norfolk; and Thong, Kent. And, in a country that delights in lavatory humor, particularly if the word “bottom” is involved, there is Pratts Bottom, in Kent, doubly cursed because “prat” is slang for buffoon.
Yea: feels and sounds just like the original; looks a lot bigger than the original; abundant archetypal FPS; about complete multiplayer options
1 british
Within the fire, because they hope to come,
I feel the need to share a bit of information with our readers: did you know that, for the most part, the houses here in Germany don’t come with central AC? Most people don’t even own window units here. The reason for this is pretty simple: the summers aren’t so hot in Germany.
Hello Blogworld, this is Jon.
I rarely see someone make the blanket statement that "all adoption is wrong." Instead, I see many adult adoptees, first parents and a minority of adoptive parents saying, "wait a minute... because it's not that simple." Yet a large number of adoptive parents react to that sentiment with extreme anger, sometimes even waving what I call the banner of God, without bothering to even prayerfully consider the opinion expressed. (For example, just this past week sweet Kim received some unkind emails from a few adoptive parents simply because she linked to an adult adoptee blog post that she found thought-provoking. Really, y'all? I can understand people sending me hate emails. Happens at least once a month. But KIM?)
The phrases are repeated, with heartfelt wishes, again and again, starting with “May I feel….”, repeating the four qualities on the right side, progressing to “May you feel….”, “May we feel….” and then “May all beings feel…..”.
5. All our former charismatic readers will relate to the FACT that almost every charismatic congregation attempts to achieve their understanding of “early church” structure — you know “we are a Book of Acts church!” declaration. Yet none of these fellowships are liturgical at all in any historical/orthodox sense! What the claim to be (early church) they are not —in fact, early Christians would not recognize most of what happens in 90% of churches today.
If I let myself go, I'll have a page and a half blog post, so I'll just say, I had a good mom. She was a redhead, drank beer, made homemade cinnamon rolls and really loved life. She and my dad were married 32 years. My mom wasn't ready to leave us, but when I find a random penny or a cardinal flies across my path, I know she hasn't really.
Please use colors similar to the challenge colors listed above.
This isn’t a mission statement or vision pinned to the corridor walls of HQ – this is the essence of every activity you undertake minute by minute, hour by hour, day by day and year by year.
In short, what a WSI franchise offers you is the security to be able to do what you want even while everyone else is convinced the world is about to end and that the economy will never ever get better. It’s a realistic option for people who aren’t interested in letting other people or circumstances control their decisions.
The above recommendations apply to those seeking to become dog trainers and/or behavior consultants. If you are seeking to become a behaviorist, education to the Masters level or higher through a legitimate grad school is a must. Courses of study that behaviorists pursue include behavior analysis, animal behavior, clinical behaviorism, and veterinary behaviorism. Since there are no laws governing use of terms such as "dog trainer" or "behaviorist", many people who label themselves behaviorists actually aren't - in other words, they do not have the college degrees that should accompany usage of such a label.
People will generally do whatever they think they can get away with. Where the authorities are concerned this is doubly so.
Serve on fresh buns with a salad on the side and you have a yummy dinner, with very little effort.
When the event started 3 years ago, I was very involved in the planning and the coordinating, but as the years have gone by, I've been doing much less for the PTA, in general. I got a little burned out. Sometimes I don't even bother showing up for these things. This time, though, I was informed by the committee "we've signed you up to help at checkout." They don't even ask, they just put my name down on the list of people who will help do math related things at the end of the night. It's okay, though, I would have volunteered, anyway.
Well, don’t worry youngsters, the Grey-Haired Brigade is here, and in 2012 we are going to take back our nation. We may drive a little slower than you would like but we get where we’re going, and
While watching This Week yesterday, Rick Santorum was on the show and discussing Afghanistan. First of all, I must say that I think always interesting when people who know absolutely nothing about foreign affairs get into a discussion about them. I don’t think Rick Santorum is stupid, but I do think he is less than educated about foreign affairs; and therefore, to question the president who has as much information as anyone can, is ridiculous. Does that mean the president is always right? No, of course not. But to question the president’s understand, when he’s looking at all of the facts, and you’re not, is silly.
The smell of fresh blood, bile, fish, and the crack of the butcher cleaver against bone were just too much for her. I looked over at Beej as she lifted a single finger to her nose and choked back a gag. Beads of sweat quickly appeared on her forehead and the pale color in her face told me we needed to get out of this “wet market” before we had a nausious woman contaminating the chicken feet and pig intestine.
I do not know how he could possibly have been so talented in so many ways. We saw a whole special exhibit that showed his art – paintings, drawings, and photographs, all done by Hugo. (He was really into painting castles. Every, or almost every, painting of his included one somewhere.)
I don’t like being ignored, especially after I’ve reached out to someone. It’s like introducing myself to someone at a party, and having him pretend he didn’t see me or hear me. We’re not all meant for each other, and just because I’m interested doesn’t mean he is – I get that. But don’t ignore me! Send me a polite “No, thank you,” preferably with a sentence of either truth or tact. Even just saying (as I do, when the tables are turned), “Thank you for writing. You sound like an interesting person, but I don’t think we’re a match. Best wishes for finding what you seek,” leaves me feeling fine.
‘”I have done that,” says my memory. “I cannot have done that,” says my price, and remains inexorable. Eventually– memory yields.’ (before Freud)
"NEW YORK, NY, February 7, 2012 – Condé Nast will publish a Domino special edition entitled
This ridiculous fixed rate policy in the south must stop!
There are bloggers like Kimberly of Mom in the City who posts reviews and while she might not fit into an old school definition of mommyblogging, is one of the kindest, coolest, most authentic, honest writers I've had the privilege of meeting. I've sat on panels with her and she brings a thoughtfulness to the conversation that most of us could learn from. Any time anyone disses a product blogger I think, well - look at Kimberly. I love what she brings to blog comments anytime I catch her name beneath a post.
Textbook: Corrigan, White and Mazaj, Critical Visions in Film Theory (2011) and other assigned readings
3) Mick Dodson, an Aboriginal leader who wrote the Human Rights and Equal Opportunity Commission report “Bringing Them Home” along with Sir Ronald Wilson, has been quoted as saying: “assimilation is genocide”.
Look! It's Oprah with the humungus boobs!
First I put some chopped garlic in about a tbs of olive oil and let it cook for a few minutes, just short of getting brown. Then I drained a can of green beans, saving the liquid, and added that to the oily garlic. I looked in the fridge and found some leftover kernels of corn and put in about half a cup. I drained and rinsed a can of pinto beans and tossed that in too. I let those sit over a med heat, stirring occasionally, just to put a little brown on the vegetables.
Add the powder expect pickle and fry for a minute.
4. Add eggs one at a time and continue to beat until blended.
Stunned, Kelly mindlessly flipped through the channels on her TV trying to find a distraction. But the only thing that seemed to help was her cat, Stevie T (short for Stephen Tyler). He was curled up on her lap, purring away. Kelly stroked the long yellow fur on the tabby whose only purpose in life was to sleep, eat, and soak up attention. She scratched behind his ears. “Wish I was you,” she said. The cat opened his green eyes slightly and let out a soft meow, likely in protest that Kelly had spoken. “Sorry.”
The above-mentioned law distinguishes between the statutory obligatory functions of the Bar Association (section 2) and its other non-obligatory functions and competences (section 3). One of the non-obligatory functions which appears in section 3 is "to provide legal assistance to persons without means".
I am so appreciative for many things in my life.
- the absence of suitable accommodation, developed to meet client needs, will send this FDI elsewhere and the potential jobs will be lost to Ireland;
There are many good introductions to trilobites so I don't intend to spend long on this aspect, but to give alittle background, they are a group of marine arthropods that lived from the early Cambrian (about 526 mya) until the mass extinction at the end of the Permian (about 250 mya). They were incredibly successful and diverse with about 17,000 species currently known from the fossil record. Some scavenged, filter-fed or hunted on the sea bed while others swam and fed on plankton. Some, mainly in the family Olenidae, may have had a symbiotic relationship with sulphur-metabolising bacteria from which they derived nutrition (Fortey, 2000). Also, they grew as nymphs/instars through a series of moults, each becoming progressively larger, much like many modern-day invertebrates. Despite the rich fossil record, the taxonomy and phylogeny of trilobites remains somewhat uncertain - currently it seems plausible that they fit into the clade Mandibulata (i.e. Myriapoda, Crustacea & Hexapoda) (Scholtz & Edgecombe, 2005) although they have been popularly placed in the clade Arachnomorpha which includes all other arthropods. The jury remains out on which is correct (or at least the most appropriate).
Social engineering was to change the physical and mental environment, and thereby change people, who were seen as malleable. But people are not malleable — human nature needs familiar surroundings to develop and be happy. People react aggressively and destructively if this is denied.
In saline brews of misbegotten eyes
I am part of, yet not of the crowd. I cannot follow, for following would demand an engagement with catastrophe that Deleuze insists awaits me. Engagement with process is all, but engagement with catastrophe would precipitate a ‘fall’ through a hermeneutic circle that forms the rim of an abyss of self-knowledge. Such a fall would be fatal, as an artist’s life must be spent searching but never finding, only circling the abyss in the process of achieving the unachievable. While living in the paradox then I ‘use’ the concepts, I ‘practice’ Deleuze in a way that I think he would appreciate, and I hope that such seeming arrogance will be understood for what it truly is. Where difference exceeds the limitations of representation by distant horizons, I engage in complex repetition, wherein difference is internalised and the two of us, Deleuze and I, as singularities, reflect each other.
Our next port of call was St. Thomas. We boarded a bit of a sketchy/scary ride aboard an open-air shuttle that careened around the curves of the mountains a bit too quickly, and I instructed everyone just to look straight ahead. We arrived at Sapphire Beach, ate the lunch which we had ordered via room service from the ship, and swam the afternoon away.
The victim was pronounced brain dead before his life support was switched off.
Best Costume Design
Once again I'm going to pull that "I'm super effing busy" line on you guys, and I apologize, but I am super effing busy. The holidays were insane combined with the fact that I was working like a mad woman to get my Design Exam completed, buy last minute Christmas presents, make plans, bake and decorate, and see friends and family without losing my mind. I honestly don't even remember the week between Christmas and New Years. Classes started back up yesterday and I'm doing that part time plus 35 hours of work and finishing the exam, which is due Monday and frankly I'm a little nervous. If you read my blog regularly you probably already know that. Keep your fingers crossed for me if you will and I'll let you know the results (whether you want them or not) by late January or early February.
Donkey and master are closer to market
As far as nobody investigating Jones Harvest, that is not the case at all. I tell people not to bother with the Better Business Bureau because they are totally ineffective. Even when Airleaf was getting ready to close and over 100 complaints were filed, they still gave Airleaf a positive rating. This was six months after the Attorney General had filed an order against Airleaf. If you pay dues to the Better Business Bureau, it takes a mountain to move their molehill. However, I am having the authors file complaints with the appropriate government officials who will take the necessary steps to stop the fraudulence. It takes time, but it does happen. Just like Airleaf had a judgment filed against it by the State of Indiana, no doubt Jones Harvest is moving in the same direction.
- Chateaubriand
There comes a time when the child has to accept that their parent has weaknesses and frailties. One of my favorite parental curses is, “May I live long enough that you have to change my diapers.”
We are officially in countdown: three Sundays until D’s birthday, she’ll be 8 years old – *mutters* about time flying fast and just where have the last few years gone!
Brooklyn Finance Business Center
155kg!
Now, ALEKS taught me that Ben could be much more responsible for his own learning. So we are taking Geometry and Chemistry from the same site . He's a natural in Geometry, but if he quit today, he'd have a 26% for the year in Chemistry. But he's still plugging away because his dream is to work with steam engines (and thus boilers) and he needs the chemistry, so he doesn't give up. It's presented in the same format, and he learns it slowly yet completely. I don't spend any time helping. By the grace of God and hard work he'll pass Chemistry if he bites the bullet. He just needs to come up with 44% more points to pass...and, it fulfills Georgia's damn standards!
One of our group homes had their party a few days ago, and it was a big hit! The kids had so much fun with their gifts and their new friends. Pizza was had by all. Even the foster parents look relaxed! We are so grateful to our sponsors for doing this - it's a wonderful thing for the kids, but most important is that the foster parents feel supported in their job. It's hard work caring for 5 disabled children as if they were your own - they deserve it!
After we got in with our many bags (I travel with lots of little bags, plus food), my dad and I walked over to the Expo and bib pick-up. It was mobbed but well organized. I got my stuff quickly, then we split up for an hour of browsing. I ended up with a new NuuMuu (running dress) to wear in the race, and some Tevas for fun (discount if you buy two or more pairs!). I did get a little shopping fever. Luckily I didn't find anything else I had to have.
Remove the slip and check they are the same length:
Day 35.
White Kross
savanarola
With finds like this, I think I will go 'post digging' more often :-)
He continues to remind,
try telling yourself that you want to
It is important that you protect the private key. If your private key is compromised, the encryption is worthless. You should store a copy of your private key and a certificate revoke snippet offline on a removable drive and store it in a safe place. The best scenario is to throw the private key and revoke package into an encrypted file system on a thumb drive, and chuck that into a fire-proof safe.
Seconds later, an electrified grid arced out around, then expanded outwards for five seconds. Finally, an area of four feet became brilliantly encompassed; shooting out fingers of highly charged electricity.
1/4 tsp red pepper flakes
The overwhelming sadness is shocking because of the next stage. I am surprised how sad I am. Maybe it is because I realized that the man I married is not the man I am divorcing. Maybe it is because I am mad at God, the universe, or any other powers that be that took a beautifully sweet man and made him rotten. Maybe it is because I did not have one doubt when I married him and now I can’t wait to get those divorce papers worked up. Maybe it is because I gave it everything I had and then found more deep in the depths of my soul and gave even more only to be shot down, blamed, rejected.
Please see the bilingual version below
I wonder how they're going to handle the collateral damage from their foolish statements?
There’s no living in my life anymore
my essence escapes in wet footprints left behind on the marble—
Everything you see is from bits and bobs that didn't make it on my cards on my blog, I keep everything!! I recycled the string and kraft is from an old papermill box. Owl and cloud stamps are Sarah's, love em!!.
All purpose flour - 1 cup
The Sailors Varsity Baseball team lost a hard fought 5-3 game to West Shore Conference rival Bay last night. Andrew Harcula pitched a solid game giving up 3 earned runs while striking out 5. Kyle Nader, Mitch Peterson, Gabe Skahen and Vinny Ragnoni each had 2 hits while Alec Adams and Ryan Miller each had 1 hit.
Only purchase from sites that offer secure browsing (SSL/https). You can tell if a site uses SSL/https if there is a padlock icon on the bottom corner or in the address bar of your browser. Some browsers like Internet Explorer and Chrome turn the address bar green to indicate that the site is secure. Even if a site uses SSL/https, remember that SSL only works to create a secure Internet tunnel between you and the e-commerce server. You can still transmit sensitive data over to cyber criminals, so it’s best to run frequent anti-malware scans.
for a while..
“The only hope for the world is to make sure there is not another United States. We can’t let other countries have the same number of cars, the amount of industrialization, we have in the US. We have to stop these Third World countries right where they are.”
She admits smoking pot as a teenager, which sets a terrible example for the youth of America, unlike Barack Obama, who admits smoking pot as a teenager, and whose “refreshing candor” is a breath of fresh air after eight years of Cheney-Bush.
The speaker lineup is impressive, and many are hoping that it yields a practical way forward on a topic that shines almost every day of the year in Arizona.
Another thing that helped me out this time around is that I planned meals for the entire week, not just Monday to Friday.
the nest is for nothing when the bird has flown.”
Make & Model: Honda Edix 1.7
Lemuel Gulliver was a fictional adventurer who was the protagonist of the novel Gulliver's Travels, first published in 1726.
Depending on where we move next, scarves may be a necessary part of my daily routine in the winter so at least I'm all stocked up in case I need them!
Sunday I lingered in His Presence. That means I read the Word, prayed, praised worshiped, knelt at the altar, and confessed my own sins.
They held the show in the same museum, but they spread the student work throughout the upper galleries so it was mixed in with the stuff on permanent display. There was much more room to move around, and breathe every now and again. Still crowded, but tolerably so.
Whether they realize it or not, Americans are increasingly embracing policies that undermine the international rule of law, with self-identified liberals, in particular, seemingly reversing their positions on matters such as the Guantanamo prison camp, extrajudicial assassinations and arbitrary detention.
So far this pregnancy I have been absolutely DRAINED. My Dr. just tells me to eat more protein. I tried it doesn't work. ;) Oh 5 hour energy how I miss thee!! I started feeling him move like 3 weeks ago not kicking but moving. Kinda cool. And just like with my other pregnancies I start feeling the braxton hicks contractions earlier and earlier. Also with each one, labor gets shorter by 2 hours Braydens was 8 hours from the time I was admitted, Landon was 6, Aspyn was 4, so that would be awesome if this one was only 2! Well as long as I get my epidural that is :)
I will be sure to let you all see the new and improved pillows once they are done!
But taking into account Tiffany Vogt's article about true romances being so rare on television, I think it is not a far cry to suggest that the relationship between Jack and Kate, the subtleness, the uncertainty, the ambiguity, after all was said and done painted a much richer, much different and truly consistent picture of a romance than the usual, simplified and amplified TV show relationship.
That is first off not entirely true...Jacob needs a family just as much as the next kid and we were NOT the first family asked...we were the first to say yes. This incident is a special case. We were NOT looking to adopt. We knew we could not afford it and have been proceeding toward foster care. We were approached about this and there are circumstances that you don't have any idea about. GOD brought Jacob to us. I know this without a doubt. The entire situation has been so beautifully orchestrated that it couldn't be anything else. I haven't shared the whole story because it isn't all my story to tell...I would like to leave that to Jacob someday. I can assure you he is going to have a testimony like no other.
Won't you spare me over til another year
( gifts my own)
Read more at Earth Teachling
The USSR collapsed before their eyes. The USSR possessed military power, including a nuclear arsenal, but nevertheless, it collapsed. According to the law of Allah, they should collapse as well, unless they pull themselves together and stand by what is just. My message to the Muslim rulers in general, and to the Arab rulers in particular, is that they should be God-fearing with regard to their nation. The peoples have spoken, but the rulers have closed their ears, as if they cannot hear, and have covered their eyes as if they cannot see.
I sat outside this afternoon and read for awhile, listening to some of my favorite sounds. I love the sound of chirping birds, a train whistle in the distance, and the trees creaking in the gentle breeze. A dog barks in the nearby development, children are laughing, and far away, someone’s chainsaw is at work. These are the sounds that say home and normal to me.
From the EP "No.3" released earlier this year. It's their only track currently available on MySpace and I would strongly suggest going here to download their latest, Akon-sampling, single "Let Them", which would be my ideal choice for this playlist.
“Overall, we find that for less religious people, the strength of their emotional connection to another person is critical to whether they will help that person or not,” study co-author and University of California, Berkeley social psychologist Robb Willer said in a statement. “The more religious, on the other hand, may ground their generosity less in emotion, and more in other factors such as doctrine, a communal identity, or reputational concerns.”
Under the legislation, investigations of local government leaders would be public if disciplinary action is taken, they resign or a complaint is dropped as part of another employee’s separation agreement, the Pioneer Press’ Christopher Magan reported. A broader initial proposal “had tried to make all investigation of top government leaders public, but advocates for school and local government officials objected when the measure reached the Senate. They feared ‘unfounded allegations’ or other sensitive information might be made public.”
But the girl just giggled and smiled at us. I made some silly faces at her, and she laughed hard enough that the rocket fell out of her mouth. She picked it up off the floor and started to put it right back in her mouth, but when I made a move to take it, she instead tossed it into my cart and laughed some more.
Last Saturday, I had my appointment with the ophthalmologist. Interestingly, they use the same machines as when I was a kid. Anyway, I described the floater, along with the other symptoms I had: sparkles of light when I showered, and losing my eyesight in one eye for a quarter of a second. The doctor was concerned when he heard my symptoms. He told me those could be signs of MS, a pseudo brain tumor, or it could mean nothing. So he scheduled me to see a neuro-ophthalmologist on Thursday and an MRI for the following Monday.
Went to see a movie and my writing workshop brain was troubled by how poor the storytelling was.
Yet, paradoxically, he has the kindest, most compassionate heart. He loves to help other people and has real empathy for those who are suffering in any way. He didn't think that giving that little boy the building set was a big deal. He told me that the boy had been building a spaceship was really upset that he didn't win and he started crying. When Jackson saw how sad this little boy was, he handed him the prize he'd just won.
Last night he brought his coaching buddy to his first show. Marsh and Scott have coached several seasons of soccer and are into their second season of coaching Little League. Scott wanted to hear “Hungry Heart” and other tunes from back in the day; Marsh bet him $1000 Bruce wouldn’t play that song. Scott was incredulous, but after the show he remarked that he didn’t even miss it because Bruce has such an amazing selection of songs to choose from.
The To Have part generally proves unpleasant, especially for the mother. We endure nine months of anxiety, emerging stretch marks and intrusive medical instruments. The incubation period culminates in a formidable event purported to be part of the cycle of life, but which seems to indicate God has a rather sick sense of humor.
One Celebritology reader told me she was lucky enough to snag Sawyer’s outfit from the pilot episode for the bargain basement price — in “Lost” auction terms, anyway — of $650. But the majority of items tended to go for upwards of $1,000, making bidding from one’s home laptop an often disheartening affair. (What? I can’t even get some Apollo candy bars without dropping 2K?)
“I have something for you,” Annie said before leaving, and she handed me a revolver with a box of bullets. “I want to let go. Can you get rid of these for me?”
Chef Seiji Yamamoto keeps the tradition of Japanese cuisine alive in his restaurant, Ryugin, but doesn’t fear stepping outside of the box, which will keep you guessing and back for more. Definitely a top highlight of my dining experience throughout Japan so far, Ryugin is highly recommended to all foodies in the Tokyo area. The staff at Ryugin is highly deserving of their third Michelin star as well as all other awards and accolades they have received. Their devotion and passion is clearly shown through every single plate.
1/2 t vanilla
Since the Federal Reserve is dedicated to a 2% inflation target instead of willing to target higher nominal GDP in order to bring down unemployment, this cartoon speaks volumes.
here is the link to the “Efficiency scaling” HF transformation into ULF/VLF/ELF via the ionosphere.
The fashion house will also be introducing a new line, a+ro. This new line puts an edgy twist on knit wear, using prints and pops of bright colors. Whether you’re looking for that one special summer trend or need to revamp your wardrobe, this shopping spree will leave you wall and closet full of happiness, with put a smile on your face. See you there!
1196 **D-X/7(B)/1994. “The Poetry of Robert Burns.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(12), above, pp. 331-49.)
Stampeders- Oh My Lady
Would we have cared more,
If you are worried about the game being too quick, simply print out 2 copies to make it last longer. My kids were happy to keep starting over, keeping track of who had won more rounds.
My budget for this room is limited, so I'm using mostly what we have. I've thrown together a few mood boards that don't quite bring my vision to life.
Oh, you know, that little part where it says that if you want to have a militia, that the President owns it? And, by extension, the only valid militia is that of your State, which the President owns, too (check history, the real one, not what you learned in public school, for numerous examples before you argue the feel-good patriot-fantasy to the contrary). So, in effect, my patriot friends, by swearing to the sanctity of the Constitution, you have handed over your one means of enforcing compliance with that Bill of Rights fantasy. See also that militia stuff buried within the Article I, Section 8 laundry list, as well as in Article IV, Section 4.
April 6: New podcast with Rice Freeman-Zachery posted now on her blog Notes from the Voodoo Lounge and on Create Mixed Media where we catch up on all the live events for my book release from last week, talk about the events coming up, discuss just what exactly a Twitter party is, and talk about our plans to start and co-host a call-in radio show.
It was all down hill from there. My focus was completely gone! Miles 7 and 8 took me 7:39 and 7:48 to get through(the slowest I’ll normally slow down to is a max of 7:15ish) while miles 11 and 12 took a disastrous 8:01 and 8:43! I did finish strong though, making it through mile 13 in 6:44(partially because it was downhill).
Madame Arcati is delighted to learn that legendary author Roger Lewis is moving shelter.
i think i'm going to watch lolita (the 1997 version) again.. this has to be the 70th time.
15. Peanuts Quote
Sometimes on his way home he'd stop at Bagleys, which was the fine jewelry and china store in town. He'd walk in, sunburned, perhaps trailing grains of sand, wearing his moccasins and a white t-shirt, and, as he always told the story (and he told it more than once), the snooty Bagleys personnel would look down their nose at him and say, "Can I help you?" clearly thinking that he had no money for their fine things. But my mother's birthday is in August, and Guv would look around at the bone china and the Limoges porcelain and the gold jewelry, and he would buy her something.
I have a special place to fill; a role for me alone. Salvation waits until I take this part as what I choose to do. Until I make this choice, I am the slave of time and human destiny. But when I willingly and gladly go the way my Father’s plan appointed me to go, then will I recognize salvation is already here, already given all my brothers and already mine as well.
Snack: protein bar
The point I want to make is that we can’t just take trades based on a great pattern alone. It is absolutely true that we can be sloppy with our pattern selection and still make money if we are long in a super trending market. But I never wanted to win “Lucky”, I wanted to win consistently. In order to do that, I had to completely adjust my thinking.
In that poem
Not letting you out of my arms’ reach
I love it when I make a great dish. It makes me feel like I actually have some skills in the kitchen.
In this Wyeth illustration from "Treasure Island", the heroes are preparing to raise the flag of their fort, in defiance of the pirates that are laying siege outside the walls. He could have painted the moment where the flag is raised in a heroic fashion against the sun, with pirates firing their muskets at it and the heroes straining to raise the flag. It could have been painted as a big dramatic moment, but instead Wyeth chose the moment before: the simple action of the character sewing the flag to the flagpole and preparing to hoist it above the fort.
And a bit loopy from the steroids and cold medicine, apparently. Because I insisted on making a video in the car on the way to the concert.
The frailty of human links, the feeling of insecurity that frailty inspires, and the conflicting desires to tighten the bonds yet keep them loose, all make us more vulnerable.
Page after page of this beautiful oversized book shows us the devastating effects of AIDS on the children. Some are orphaned, some must care for ailing adults, and some are left to become the caretakers of their younger siblings. It’s the eyes of these children that will haunt you long after you have put the book down.
“Therefore, since we are surrounded by such a great cloud of witnesses, let us throw off everything that hinders and the sin that so easily entangles. And let us run with perseverance the race marked out for us.” Hebrews 12:1
ZH also has some well-priced rugs in their offering. Here is an example, called Samolo. I am normally not a fan of hide rugs because I hate the hairy texture, but I think this one looks cool...
She said that the public is already confused with current enforcement methods and calls the idea “crazy”.
I find inspiration for love stories in unlikely places, from unlikely people, doing unlikely things. For, as powerful or successful as we all are in our lives, I still think the greatest thing is to love and be loved in return. My favorite line from Moulin Rouge.
i’m not the right guy to answer that
But in other situations, the two roles don’t mix well. If you have a really frustrating day at work, you should be able to vent to your good friends, but not if those friends are your employees. You probably don’t often correct or reprimand your friends, but you might have to correct or reprimand an employee. Friends see you at your best and your worst, but you never want your employees to see you at your worst. Friendships work better when the two people are peers, and you’re simply not your employees’ peer. If you try to be friends with your employees, sooner or later someone’s feelings are going to be hurt.
I had a nice, productive weekend. I had to work on the dissertation first - yes, this is what it looks like in my office when I'm writing.
1 1/2 teaspoons fresh thyme, or about 1/3 heaping teaspoon ground thyme
-what a difference a coat of paint would make-
Julia Baird is a Deputy Editor of Newsweek.
1. Who is your favorite character so far?
I hope you will join me in objecting to this. Be loud, be proud, and stand up to the kind of Fascism that I had hoped we were done with when Bush left office.
The reality is that every accident, every war casualty or bomb victim, every execution, every murder, every sickness, every bad horrible thing is not simply happening to someone else. It’s happening to someone else’s Ella.
For starters saying no is not easy. Running a business I hear the word no a lot, rejection is what you have to get use to in business. Picture that every day at least five people are going to tell you no and still continue to push through it. Because that yes makes everything worth wild. The point is, the word no is hard to deal with and you hear it so many times in a day, that it can be discouraging, I get that. Usually when someone tells you no, it’s not nice, anyway they put it, because you or your idea was rejected.
As night falls, Happy Slap Boutique will transform into a plethora of circus, fire and glow performances alongside clowning, grotesque burlesque, world famous 'Rave Aerobics' and surprise acts that keep buzzing all night.
But you have to decide how far you are willing to take this. Some people would like to have extra income, or more money in order to pay off debt. Others might wish to be rich beyond their wildest dreams. Breaking it down into categories is necessary since you will be studying different people depending on what your goals are.
I used Epiphany Craft round tool to make a couple really cute little embellishments with the papers. I'm so excited we get to be a part of this and I am loving Momenta's products. I think they are really have GREAT prices on their products. The quality and price is unbelievable!
Next update in a few weeks !
And at the end of that I wanted to immediately run out and try more cheese with it, explore more taste combinations, but I'll have to leave that to this weekend when hopefully I'll get to visit at least one of the Dublin beer and cheese events. The Bull & Castle's tasting platter looks right up my random-pairing alley. You'll find Eight Degrees at the Ballyhoura Spook mountain biking Halloween party on Sunday while Dungarvan Brewing have organised a beer and cheese pub quiz in The Moorings tonight. There are loads more events going on around the country. As I say, check the website.
100% Tempranillo – aged 20 months French barriques (70%) and American barriques (30%). Made from 90 year old ungrafted / Piede Franco Tempranillo vines on the estate, I assume there is enough sand in the soil for these vines to have survived without being grafted.
Do you have a passion for writing?
Dry on skin: The leather has softened quite a bit….it does really smell like worn leather boots. I’m not sure what pink pepperberry smells like but if it’s in this I like it!
With the head I had a chance to play up two of my favourite Ork elements - 'teef' and fungus. Teef function as currency, and Ork mouths and faces are very much defined by them. I love the ways the sculptors have played with them over the years and this is an homage. As for the fungus, it's always been in the background as food and drink, and since the late '90s and Gorkamorka the Orks have grown from it. Ork spores drift, Orks and their ecosystem grow in cool places and worlds are infested. I like the idea of fungus sprouting on an Ork as moles might on us, and a bare head is a good space.
The "she" who shared this story with me is C., a mom of 3 from Cameroon (west Central Africa) who works & attends Howard U. full time. C. had just finished giving a class presentation. The "punk" is one of many American Black students who openly and unapologetically "diss" Africans because of the way they dress, the way they speak, the way their food smells, the sounds they make when they speak their native language, or any other aspect of their culture or being that can be singled out for insult.
from a cabinet he tore out of the kitchen
17. Renee
My Dad (on the left) at one of the power plants he built - the gentleman on the far right is Kasem Chatikavanij, General Manager of the Electrical Generating Authority of Thailand, later Minister of Industry for Thailand.
Howdy! It’s been a week. School had started last week, Wednesday. I can’t tell you all the details now, but maybe someday I will, not just today. The problem is I can’t have that time for Lomography weekends already because of school. Yet, maybe perhaps, I could share a little stuff which happened on the first week of being a junior in high school.
Try two handfuls of produce, such as berries, mango, kale, or tomatoes. Frozen is just as healthy as fresh.
The elites try to change our thinking by changing our vocabulary: the British government guidelines to the media suggesting certain words about non-white crime be replaced. The words to be suppressed included “immigrant,” “illegal immigrant,” “illegal asylum seeker,” “bogus asylum seeker,” “non-white,” “non-Christian,” “mixed race,” “half-caste,” “mulatto.” There is the substitution of euphemistic terms for those that reflect reality as in the official designation of “Anti-Islamic activity” for Muslim terrorists.
Until I made these, I had never really never made a ruffle or gathered fabric before.
This was on the third and final day of the Students for Justice in Palestine “teach-in".
Real men don’t let tears fall do they? Be it as a sign of happiness or sadness?
What with all the excitement (trips to Brussels, wedding excitement yah-de-yah) I've not had time to blog about the normal goings on at the sewing machine. So here's a little update on smaller things I've made as gifts and for selling in the shops. Hopefully not too boring and same-y!
HIS SEAMS WERE BARE.
You need to know that mom took Molly outside this afternoon to do poo's and Molly looked mom right in the eyes and AireSnapped at her - two snaps! Of course, mom burst out laughing but I think it's pretty sassy and rude for an only 9-week old baby girl!
Pre-Internet, before Hampton the Hampster was even a small, hairless pink suckling thing, matters were rather different, and avenues for exposure naturally rather limited. There were very few short-cuts to fame available, and you simply had to slog your way around the unforgiving gig circuit in the hope the hard work would slowly pay off. Or... alternatively, you could marry a multi-millionaire at the head of an enormous business empire and ask him to promote your work. It's the stuff of lottery-win dreams, but this is actually what Dora Hall did. Leo Hulseman, founder of the Solo Cup plastic drink cup dispenser and picnic accessory company, turned his attention to the plastic known as vinyl and decided to give his wife's entertainment career a bit of a boost. That Dora was already middle-aged by the time the opportunity arose presented no obstacle to his master plan, and in fact he would continue in his loyal duty towards her even during her twilight years as a grandmother in her seventies.
The inaugural issue hit the streets in mid-December and has become quite a hot ticket, according to publisher Jeffrey Diaz.
We do this by using a terminal application on the Android device – for our examples we will be using “BlueTerm” which can be downloaded from Google Play – search for “blueterm” as shown below:
My passion: I have many-vintage, fashion, reading, writing, sewing. I tend to be very opinionated about things and either love it or hate it.
We have a very special day planned. We will ride into Furore, a tiny town perched high above the sea and tour the highly acclaimed Marisa Cuomo winery. Then we will enjoy a 7 course prix fixe lunch, complete with Marisa Cuomo wine pairings.
And - I did not add anything to my stash this week! I didn't use up anything either, but that's ok!
A cold chill felt without warning.
This blog relates to biotech patent practice in Europe. It is based on our experience of drafting and prosecuting biotech applications. The blog is written from the viewpoint of practice at the European Patent Office (EPO), though many of the issues that are discussed are also applicable to other territories.
Fake Tae Yong gives a presentation and the whole time Tae Mu imagines that he outs his deceit. However, his dream doesn’t come true and Yi Gak aces the presentation.
The front Page showed B movie actress Liz Hurley and a rather waxlike Shane Warne, with the headline portraying the story inside to be a 'world exclusive' about their love life, wedding plans and other such vitally important news.
I hear a satisfying crack as he grasps his nose and falls to the ground.
Today, the wind continued to blow hard and James just managed to get a few necessary jobs done so that ‘Chance’ was ready to go out – including getting the wood on the back. The only casualty was a plastic dust pan blown overboard but with the help of the boat pole and running down the neighbouring pontoon we got it back.
It's flattering to be recognized by marketers, of course. But as I keep reminding myself, that's not why I'm here.
“Ruh Roh” (yes, Scooby Doo style) was the first thing to pop into my head. I’m a youth pastor. I should be able to come to you with my iCloud calendar and say, “Duh, clearly my faith is number one. Can’t you see by all the scheduled prayer and solo worship time I have in my planner?”
A little white loveliness from the inside and the outside.
Going to recess with your classmates didn’t make sense to me. I was in an all-girls school and everyone moved in packs,especially during recess. Girls would wait for their friends and they’d go together to the cafeteria. In our school cafeteria, you had to go to the table for your class and you can’t sit elsewhere. If you did, teachers will tell you to go back to the right table. This ensures that you will be sitting beside your classmates no matter what your walking-to-the-cafeteria arrangements would be. So it didn’t bother me that I walked alone to the cafeteria. I knew there would be people there, and I’d be sitting beside my classmates, and I’d be able to talk to them if I wanted to.
Anyway, I had a nice long talk with my mommy last night and I was telling her what was bugging me and stuff. She completely understood and she made me feel sooo much better. So I feel good about leaving home.
Oh! the waves did bash and roar,
just by wanting it to be so
I must admit was skeptical at first.
“There is a meanness in all the arts which ladies sometimes condescend to employ for captivation. Whatever bears affinity to cunning is despicable.” (Woohoo! At last, a man who did not fall for a woman who batted her eyes and spoke in a syrupy tone. At age 12, I had had my heart broken several times because some idiot could not discern my true worth.)
Wouldn’t it be fascinating, if, in the video still below, that’s young Bâri′ with mama Jo Ann Newman? With President Sukarno, from his limo, his eyes full of love and pride, blowing kisses at Malcolm’s and Jo Ann’s boy?
Looking for a a tasty dinner, make those burritos! You won't be sorry!
1. I also get to witness exercise taking on more forms than walking. There are usually quite a few bikers and runners. I even see a rollerblader now and again. However, this past weekend I saw something I'd never seen before. I wasn't sure if I should jump off the walkway or not, because this thing was literally swerving so madly from side to side that I thought it might hit me. I really don't see the point in it, but the guy riding it seemed to be enjoying himself.
We should be good to our body. What happens to it is the result of how we take care of it. After all, we cannot let any disorder or disease to hinder us from enjoying our body.
I never said you had to be politically correct, did I?!
Pretty much everything was in silence. Granted, those who came with friends could talk to each other in between activities, but seeing as I was there for a spiritual retreat and whatnot, I was silent for almost four days (although we had two group discussions called “Dharma Sharing,” where we shared our experience with the practice of mindfulness/meditation, so I talked to people there). The experience was rather calming though. You’re listening to so much, you’re thinking about so much, it’s nice to not have to be blurting things out, making small talk. Slowly you begin to inhabit your mind and body more fully this way, become more in tune with what’s going on. I think it’s probably good for most people to have spells of extended silence.
I also discovered there are slight variations in the recipe: Dorie Greenspan makes hers with extra virgin olive oil, others use vegetable oil, and some dress up the cake with almonds, or raspberry filling.
Loved?
US Amarillo 5.0 % 1.00 oz 0.0 Bagged Pellet Hops In Hop-Back
These days, Kemp is about the only player on the Dodgers immune to the trials and tribulations going on with the team. He is having a tremendous season. Unfortunately, it doesn't seem to be rubbing off on anyone else.
All is going well and I so love my beautiful Rose!
On Friday, I could see CBS trying that Carol Mendelsohn’s Widow Detective after Blue Bloods.
Z: "dude, in my foot, AAAAAAAAA"
What does He lift up? Who is the Standard?
‘Most people just affirm it’s not possible. You at least allow room for the possibility.’
I wanted you alls to knows that we is comin back
but my daughter thinks we should attach
Why does she hunt, melancholic, for band-aids?
And then I have a secret book that I am writing RIGHT THIS MINUTE. (Well, right about now.) The plan at this point is to go straight to eBook with that just to see what happens.
The clouds drifted with uneasiness as the Obsidian Army marched south along the primary road of the Arcane Plains. General Arrys led the troops on his charger, flagmen at each of his sides. Each flag depicted a white figure of a man wearing a red cape and resting a foot on top of a defeated chimera. The image was engulfed in an all black silhouette. Behind them, Commander Luk followed on his horse, all six of his colonels around him. Each soldier of their battalion followed, broken into ranks. The other commanders and colonels were divided together with their own battalions in equally spaced ranks behind them.
Was Ander's Breivik recruited in 2002 to a neo-Gladio style network?
To frost the cake, you can first trim the tops of you cakes (with a serrated knife) first to make them flat, I didn't do this.
As Vera Reynolds, drag queen and night club star, swayed onstage singing “Falling in Love Again,” a sixteen-year-old rent boy lay in the older man’s apartment, engulfed in flames. When Tennison’s investigation reveals an influential public figure as her prime suspect, a man with connections to politicians, judges, and Scotland Yard, she’s given a very clear message about the direction some very important people would like her investigation to take. Suddenly, in a case defined by murky details, one fact becomes indisputably clear—that for Tennison, going after the truth will mean risking her happiness, her career, and even her life.
When you check the application event log you will see an entry similar to:
Each day I try to take a moment to visit the ocean, to watch the way the ocean is moving. I take that moment to use the tide as a guide for my breath – in, out, in, out. To slow down, connect and let go. In the lead up to the last full moon the ocean was full of movement, change and yet the morning after as I watched the sunrise I was in awe of its calm. It was at peace. Nothing interrupted its gentle undulation except for the school of fish I watched jumping in and out of the water, testament to its nourishing and restorative shift. It was a beautiful moment to say the least.
A graduate of the University of Michigan, Van Hoek received her law degree from Wayne State University Law School in 1976. She has worked at SADO since that time, and served as its Chief Deputy Director
Tech says it’ll only take about thirty seconds, but by the time you have to restart and bring all your programs back up, you might as well call it a day.
One sometimes have to live with the decisions made by her younger self. You know, with mutilated limbs or a tasteless tattoo on a face. I happen to have to live without a diary I wrote when I was 18.
No one can really know
it hardly seems fair, the way
3. Divide the mixture into 2 to 4 portions (depending on how many you want to make).
In the majority of cases, parents do their best to raise their children well. Most of their lessons are delivered by example rather than by formal instruction. When parents have lived a good, moral and responsible lifestyle while raising their children, it is expected that the youngsters will model the behaviors they have watched during their formative years. Every now and then, one young adult will veer away from the family's pattern.
Welcome to my blog. It time to join the MFT Stamps Design Team for our MFT "VIP New Product Tour!" to celebrate the release of this month’s MFT VIP Kit. This month the VIP kit again features two Pure Innocence stamp sets, I am sure you are going to love them!!!!!!
Everyone assumed that this was a magnanimous marriage proposal. However, what I learned by talking to one of their friends is that these were two NYU students who had been in a relationship and broken up. The boy wanted to rejoin with the girl and decided to surprise her with an extraordinary public proposal to reunite.
Dr. Moore took off the red cap of glass from the machine, exposing the five anodes arranged in an arc, each pointing toward a central point in the lower body of the aluminum casing. Opposite each anode was a beautifully coiled tungsten wire cathode from which electrons were discharged at the anode. All these anodes were so leveled and arranged that all the angles of incidence in reflecting the bombardment of electrons focused at one narrowing slit -- a sort of rectangular funnel pointing straight downward toward the quartz plate at the bottom where the rod-like ray of cold light was focused.
I wonder if the Lord still deals with people in the church this way? I wonder if there are still people like Moses who will intercede on behalf of the people? Still, who knows exactly how the Lord works in the church that is the Body of Christ?
No it wouldn't but any one of these beers would:
Jesus fixes the “bad girl” in me. Jesus frees the “good girl” in me. My only job is to seek first the kingdom of God.
3/4 cup bread flour
Natural Suburbia: What do you do to avoid burnout, how do you relax?
What would be hard for you to give up?
Swedens top players rank well compared to GBs top player with Sweden having two top 100 players in Johanna Larsson (62) and Sofia Arvidsson (74), but no-one else inside the world’s top 500, while Elena Baltacha (61) and Anne Keothavong (89) also feature in the worlds top 100 players. With Heather Watson (109) and Laura Robson (120) as back up to these players the GB squad looks to have the strength depth to cause Sweden some serious problems when they meet from the 21st-22nd of April.
Nay, there is more of matter than of mischief in this
Unlike her mother, Salka learns: she learns how to read books, how to read people, and she learns from her mistakes. We meet Salka as a rough, uneducated, illegitimate girl, who speaks her mind with complete honesty even when it means being rude. She isn't afraid of anyone, and her imposing looks and strength inspire admiration and yearning in those around her. Salka's hard work and determination bring her out of poverty and earn her independence, and throughout her hard life she finds the resources to help others along the way, through friendship and material means. Her only weakness turns out to be her lifelong love for a weak man.
It is claimed that they had “spying gadgets”. They probably had an assortment of electronic devices, probably associated with their medical work.
Given the recent revelations as to the cost of the Uff Enquiry – already estimated to exceed $50M – there are genuine concerns that we could soon have three new state-funded agencies which could absorb maybe $100M a year.
as being embraced by a giant grid. Ptolemy, by the way, knew that
… Too bad none of them down here are “into that kind of thing”.
Finishing the novel is important to me. But I have no desire to simply grind away with words and sentences and eventually fall across the finish line in numb exhaustion. I may be tired when I print out that last page but I want a smile on my face and a sense of accomplishment humming throughout my body.
Few return’d, nearly all remain in Brooklyn.
3. Luciana - "I'm Still Hot"
Whilst I’m on the topic of painting and my wee paintings I think I’ll put up a few more pictures.
Too Much Of Anything
I kinda took an impromptu semi-break from blogging this past week. the mama and the dad went on a holiday by themselves for a weekend and left us kids to fend for ourselves.
14 Your Face
As far as recovery, Jaxon did great! It was a little red and swollen for a couple hours but he was able to nurse as soon as we got home. He never acted like it bothered him. He is one tough little boy!! And last night I realized the discoloration in the middle of his lip had gotten much bigger, so I'm not sure if that's a good or bad sign. I guess I'll find out at our follow up appointment. Little man was so tired that he slept from 8:45pm- 4:30, he nursed for 10 minutes then was back asleep until 8:30am!! He usually wakes up in the middle of the night between 2-3 am and then every hour and a half to two hours after that. I had to check on him a couple of times to make sure he was still breathing because it was out of the norm for him. When he woke up he was all smiles as usual and still is eating well and not in pain from what I can tell.
Before I announce the names I would like to thank everyone who entered into our DT call, it was such a difficult choice but the new members are:
Once I have these four points worked out, I can write my story’s synopsis. Sometimes if I find that I am not sure of my character’s pathway to this story or their motivation, I will also use these four points to write a character synopsis. The synopsis does not need to be difficult nor does it need to be put off until the last unavoidable minute before you have to scratch one together in a wild panic. I also find that when I write a synopsis at the beginning of my first draft, it keeps me from hitting a block or stumbling point. Like a map, it gives me a clear path to my final destination. There may still end up being unexpected roadblocks but with just a few minutes looking back at my road map (SYNOPSIS) I am back on track.
Does it have to do with the tailoring of the garment? Once again referring to the drawings in the fourth article linked, if that vertically striped dress were more tailored, that stripe would likely not cut across her hips on the ends there. They would contour more, which I suspect would be more slimming. That same article also includes pictures of women in dresses with horizontal stripes. All of those dresses are tight dresses that countour to the body. The one example of vertical is not fitted and thus obviously not slimming. In the same vein, where I've tried on horizontal stripes and find them widening is in t-shirt knits. I find fitted t-shirt knits make me look larger anyways, and even if I could find a horizontal striped one, I doubt that it would be particularly slimming. Non-fitted tees make me look wider, also regardless of pattern, and that's where my other widening horizontal's tend to fit; not fitted. Finally, ending this thread of thought is that the vertical stripes I find to be slimming are actually countoured to my body, so they're not exactly perfectly vertical, as in the illustration.
215) dinner under the stars with my sister, her sister in law, mom in law and a friend, and late evening laughter as we lingered around the table... relaying our funny, crazy and silly stories to one another
No sign shall be given: This translates a Semitic idiom, “if a sign be given” literally, the implication being “this will never happen, or else God do something terrible to me”.(France)
While being held hostage to an impatient macaw pacing the countertop of his small kitchen island Jack racked his brain for some memory of the previous day. It all went blank early last evening after he arrived in the small tourist town of Punta Gorda joining his usual group of malcontents at one of the local bars named the Apache Saloon. After several minutes of cutting apples and oranges, enough to placate Angelina, Jack found a worn pair of cargo shorts and began a desperate search for his cell phone, which eventually lead him outside to his chief means of transportation, an ancient army surplus jeep.
THE COURT: then why the alleged difficulty of opening doors?
On top of that, it’ll probably even the fuck out of the rental market prices and force some neighbourhoods to clean their act up.
To be who you want to be, you will have to pay the price. You will have to give up opportunities to be noticed. You will have to sacrifice some personal goals for the sake of others. You will have to get out of your comfort zone and do things you have never done before. You will have to keep learning and growing when you don’t feel like it. You will have to repeatedly put others above yourself.
Heavenly Father is the perfect parent and He is my friend. I am pretty sure He will allow and teach us how to be both to our children.
But, then came the sack race! She was ready for it! See how excited she was?!?!
I eventually got called, two hours later. And when the doc–really sweet girl–told me about the possible reactions I might’ve had with my first biphosphonate infusion last year for my Osteogenesis Imperfecta and what they can do to improve my vitamin D deficiency and my osteoperosis, she looked at the computer chart and then back at me and said, “How’s your chest feeling? You’re being followed by cardiology too, right? I see your aorta is dilated!”
So, to motivate myself, I've found some pictures of skinny me and plastered them to my refrigerator. I'm going to also plaster them here, and hopefully continually motivate myself. They are kinda blurry, because they are pictures of pictures, but meh, I don't have a scanner and I don't think anyone past 2003 has one.
Snow is in trouble as the agent in charge Langral (Peter Stormare) is unsympathetic and believes him to be guilty. However, an old friend, Shaw (Lennie James) is slightly more helpful.
But loving Malcolm, trusting his judgment, and stirred by his vision for young Bâri′, she agreed to the surrender of her toddler.
Wayne Morgan traces the recognition of same-sex relationship as it developed from the feminist lobbying of the 1980s, through de facto law reform and the current debate, to look beyond the privileged ideal of coupledom.
Good night everyone!!
I’m hiding in the woods like a paparazzi and the violinist is behind me.
Just so you know, the Boutique store has been working closely with the other vendors so that we don't duplicate product. So, you won't see a mini Hobby Lobby, but we will have a lot of embellishments: flowers, brads, buttons, stickers, Cuttlebug embossing folders, Bazzill cardstock, papers, paper pads, tools, chipboard, tins, storage, adhesives and other products.
Obama gay marriage support seen as world precedent … President Barack Obama’s announcement Wednesday that he supports gay marriage boosted the hopes of gay rights groups around the world that other leaders will follow his example, though opponents denounced his switch as a shameless appeal for votes … – AP
Once my wings dry and I take flight, I'll be an amazing sight to see.
tortelduif. Russia
I’ve been avoiding this.
And ... don't ask me to pull your finger. It's dumb and GROSS!
By having these awards, librarians bring the best in contemporary publishing to the forefront and give those works a chance to vie against the classics for children's attention.
5) Today is better than never.
What started out as a little hobby has grown into a two-three hour a day effort.
Don't you think the colors of this necklace is just so pretty?
A sort of rosy glow for times past that will never come again. A biting nostalgia for the times i think I felt most warm and secure. I'm welling up just thinking of this song. Indulge me.
Title: Virtuosity
A: A publisher may take advantage of opportunities to present user-friendly information, but the general flow of the editorial and advertising must be similar. If all advertising is in a separate section of the digital product while it is interspersed in the print edition, the digital edition would be ruled a nonreplica.
With nothing between him, and everything that made me a woman, except a loosely tied piece of terrycloth...............
Freddie’s mom is so evil…
BTW: skip the ad in the beginning.
2. Beat in the egg and then the flour, baking powder and red sugar crystals. You can mix the dry ingredients separately and then add it to the wet ingredients. The red sugar gives the cookies a pretty pink hue.
What I found: How awesome is this: I found an 60's stewardess' tweed skirt that was manufactured by Airways Industries (possible Airway Industries, I'd check, but I'm wearing it right now!)
ONE last challenge to sign up for before the end of the year–trust me, this one’s a gooder! If you’re like me, you have a TON of TBR books. I recently reorganized my books and have an entire bookcase of books that I’ve bought but haven’t read. I really can’t go by a bookstore, or book display without buying something. I love garage sales, thrift stores, and book sales. ANYTHING to get a great new read!
First impression? Horrible.
Gotta book it out of here, clad & provisioned for a six-hour opera (final installment of Ring cycle!), my first swim in many months (makes more sense to go to Chelsea Piers than come uptown between) and a party downtown! Won't be home till midnight, that's a slightly overwhelming prospect given that I need to be out of here in ten minutes...
Of my life, it will not change
8 march - AB - Brussels, Belgium
The epaulettes, with the respectives distinctions of three, two, and one stars, the same as at present. Buttons as at present, with the addition of a crown over the anchor.
And stoop and build ‘em up with worn-out tools:
1. to create a visually stimulating focal point for Baby's sensory (ie. visual) development
Our hours as of right now are:
To be perfectly honest, at $59 per person + drinks, I have never been there before as I think for a person who can only eat a maximum of 2 platefuls pretty much can’t get their monies worth. BUT, as soon as I started on the food, I wondered why hubby and I have never even tried it. There were tons of variety to choose from – seafood, peking duck, yum cha style (dumplings, siomai etc), sushi, sashimi – just to name a few! Oh plus tons of desserts (my weakness!)!!! I was in heaven!
Combine 1 cup strawberry halves, 1/3 cup sugar, orange juice, vanilla, and lemon juice in a bowl, and mash with a potato masher. Stir in 2 1/2 cups strawberry halves. Cover and chill.
9am – Breaky & Mimosas
This week we are going to play a little game...I thought I was going to call it BINGO but in reality, I think it is really a modified version of Tic Tac Toe instead. Here is our card of items to choose from, an what you have to do is complete one of the following:
The empty room is inside the reader. When he connects with the poem he does it within himself, he gets to connect with a part of himself that he might not have realised was there, as if he’d walked into a room with him. I view ‘place’ in an abstract sense. When you say that a person has found his place in the world you’re probably not talking about a physical location.
Draft 1: Telling
(2) The middle and lower classes haven’t done anything to deserve them.
I am thankful for my extended family and that of my husband, which is free of any serious drama and always ready to support each other.
"Osama bin Laden, as we all know, had the very grave responsibility of spreading division and hatred amongst the people, causing the death of countless of people, and of instrumentalizing religion for this end," he said. "In front of the death of man, a Christian never rejoices but rather reflects on the grave responsibility of each one in front of God and men, and hopes and commits himself so that every moment not be an occasion for hatred to grow but for peace."
His offense to Woo Jin is interesting in that he did nothing but start a rumor, which countless high school kids do every day. In this case however, the rumor causes the worst possible damage, and the person it affects the most, (aside from Soo Ah) has vast resources and an obsessive nature. To Dae Su, starting the rumor had little significance at all. As Woo Jin points out, it was simply something he forgot because it didn't matter to him. He transferred schools and was not privy to the rumor spreading or it's effects. Dae Su fills many journals with names of people he has wronged, but the rumor never occurs to him at all, not seeing it as a wrong, perhaps, but part of his childhood.
Happy Friday, my sweet friends! I hope you've had a beautiful week! :o)
He may continue to bark, and follow, but he's much less likely to harm you.
Twitter is more of a marketplace. You can post good reviews and self-promoting news, but you need to mix it in with a lot of other stuff too - including promoting other people and celebrating their successes. Saying funny things about X Factor or the England football team is more likely to get you noticed than shouting about a great review on the Waterstones website (Oh well…if you insist…here).
So, is there ever any good trouble? In John, we see that Jesus was troubled on three occasions. First, He was troubled when Lazarus died (Jn. 11:33). Sure, He was going to raise Lazarus from the dead, but He had compassion for the mourners and He was troubled by their unbelief. The second time that Jesus was troubled was when speaking to His disciples (Jn. 12:27). I could be wrong, but I believe on this occasion that He was also troubled by their unbelief. The last occasion was at the "Last Supper". Jesus announced, with a troubled spirit, that one would betray Him (Jn. 13:21).
And he is angry. For all the positive coverage he receives, he has also been battered in the press, mostly over Atlantic Yards, but also over the private fundraising he has done on behalf of the nonprofit run out of Borough Hall used to promote his Brooklyn agenda and for the famous summer concert series he has hosted since he was a state senator.
1. Combine yeast, sugar, and 100-110 degree water. Stir to dissolve then let it sit until it’s frothy on top.
“We love the place, O God, wherein thine honour dwells.
Add the rest of the ingredients, toss, and add a bit more olive oil if the mixture seems dry. Season with salt and pepper. Roast at 400 degrees for about 60 minutes, stirring occasionally.
she'll ask you and you'll give her
It happens every year.
‘Tea Party-backed candidates swept into Washington in 2010 on a wave of opposition to bank bailouts’.
♥ I also bought a bag of mini chocolate chips & added about a cup or so into the mix. I used the peanut butter M&M's in the actual mix & regular M&M's on top. I got the idea to make this off Pinterest as well from this recipe.
Actual rape is shockingly common in the islamic world, particularly in Africa and the Arabic portions; particularly among the lower economic classes, and among what are effectively lower caste populations of indians, pakistanis, afghanis, indonesians, africans, and other darker skinned or mixed race muslims; who are imported into the arabic and other lighter skinned muslim countries as cheap labor (because many of them speak arabic, and have no resources or education to help them protect themselves).
and agreeable,
I swear I'll pay you back I just don't have it here this time
Then again, imagine trying to leave Canada with my current passport, and not being allowed to board the plane because some attendant thinks I look like a man?
File size: 46Mb
Up2U is a powerful high school student assembly, using real-life scenarios and live presentations to impart the far-reaching consequences of drug and alcohol abuse to teens, and the importance of choice in their lives.
The uninformed might think that Obama is telling his opposition to shut up.
and a long, thin shadowy opponent.
Sydney J. Bounds – The Night Walkers
Our laptop is offically dead. It's gone to be repaired, luckily we knew it was on it's way out, so everything has been backed up. So now I am using our antique old laptop, which is only just coping with me typing this post. So you'll have to bear with me for random spaces and spelling.
• CAN-Bike classes are being offered through the City of Hamilton Recreation Division this summer. Visitwww.hamilton.ca/cycling and click on Cycling Education for more information on courses that cover everything from cycling skills for kids and adults, to bicycle maintenance.
"I handed them to you a second ago," I reminded him.
They have also been training and equipping the anti-Gaddafi forces with weapons for some weeks, at the least. Yet, despite all of this massive military fire-power, being rained down on Gaddafi, and his forces, not only has their been no sign of rebellion against him in Tripoli, but even with all of that fire-power on their side, the anti-Gaddafi forces, even where they were strong, in the East, have been able to make no headway whatsoever.
Every year for the last 15 years I have cooked a turkey to donate to an inner city Christmas Community dinner. I'm only just starting to learn about the problems with the meat industry in North America and know that there are huge problems with how we produce our meat.
So for a baby chick to grow inside an egg and hatch out, you need:
“Hmmm, mu-uch better…”
Every evening I sit in that abandoned subway car, pretending to come home from work. I like to make believe that I’m worried about bills, and that there’s a warm meal already waiting for me on my dining room table. It makes my day so much more bearable, just to sit and count the stops which the train would normally be making if it were still attached to intact rails. But my! It was just so nice to actually, really see someone today. Even if it was a figment of my imagination, I’m lonely enough not to mind. I hope I see that same old couple again sometime. Maybe they’ll even speak to me some day! Oh, they just seemed so nice.
Being a filmmaker is a full time adventure for me. Mainly because I graduated two years ago with a BFA in Film and Video and no one’s paying me to make films right now. But the thing is, telling stories is what I do. Sometimes it’s hard for me to appreciate what I do because, unfortunately, I currently can’t live off of it. At least in the capacity of being able to tell my own stories. And sadly, I’m not the only artist or storyteller that’s having a hard time. So in an effort to put on my big girl knickers and not crawl under a rock, I’ve promised myself that I will find ways to tell stories and take as many opportunities as I can. Now’s when I share two things I did out of making that promise in hopes that someone finds this useful. Even if that someone’s my future self having a “woe is me” moment.
Or else, you can take what you learn from the legacy and create something vastly different. Aside from being difficult it can also be particularly intimidating to go this route considering the unknown reaction from peers and the vulnerability of presenting something you have created, which makes acceptance or rejection more personal. But if it catches, what a contribution to the world of humanities you would make!
For those who don’t know what happened, here’s a summary:
This month I've been loving...
Whom with any rite
Above is the front cover to my senior year high school yearbook (Tucson High School class of '83!!), and here is the story behind it.
I do know enough to realize their character personalities have been juxtaposed. Starsky isa tough, by the book cop while Hutch is a laid back, never grown up Frat boy. On the series, it was the exact opposite. Is that supposed to be part of the joke? Huggy Bear, played like a cay street philosopher by rapper Snoop Dogg, acts more like the glue that holds the cops friction filled partnership together through this, their first assignment.
“In conjunction with DPA’s It Came From Dallas – The Magnificent 7th, The Texas Theatre is screening two full “It Came From Dallas” films in a special B-movie double feature on Saturday February 18th”
Bicycle Transportation Alliance
Stier agreed. “The first lady wields a powerful pulpit whenever she speaks. She needs to be careful that her words are not misunderstood," he said.
The little old lady went off. Blustering, frowning, huffing.
I'm liking the name Paisley right now. Is Paisley Renee too sing-songy? I know it's trendy right now, but Paisley is a nice down-to-Earth name for a farm girl. Plus it starts with a "P". Husband likes names that start with a "P". Paul, Owen, and Paisley - that sounds nice. And I could decorate her room in Paisley and it'd be perfect!
If this was her attempt at upstaging Courtney Love’s make-up throwing antics and their ilk, it backfired, as far as I’m concerned. At least Doctors Without Borders saw $500 from the sale of the program.
In the city where I live, some buses introduced an automatic ticket-scanner. You inserted your weekly or monthly season ticket into the scanner, it verified the ticket and you got on.
Afterwards we put the car back with a note on the windscreen giving the art directors contact number and apology for the broken driver’s window.
According to one cable after the 2008 hurricanes, a colonel in the Interior Ministry’s Border Guard Troops asked the drug interdiction specialist whether the U.S. government was “planning an operation,” understood as asking whether Washington was concerned about a possible mass exodus by desperate hurricane victims.
*we shopped at the local boutiques
Because she knows how I love that show (and lust after Ms. Anwar), she finagled a quick snap with her. Their brief conversation went something like this.
The second one, right?
Suddenly these problems get even more complex, especially considering they’ve tripped into Amy’s fantasy: Ezrantia. Revelations about her mother send Amy into an alcohol fueled downward spiral. Carrie obsesses over home. Dean is heartbroken. Mitch and Renee run from their fears and into a desert.
As promised, here's a great poetry prediction activity you can use in your classroom! If you grab it, let me know! :)
olive oil, salt, pepper.
Social media was getting big and I was still trying to figure out how to program numbers into my cell phone. Thank God for admins and personal assistants that kept up with technology.
I’m very shock to see all the gaudy vendors are gone, the beach is now lined with rental chairs and umbrella, you no longer need to schlep all those anymore.
underneath the shade
Improved Circulation and Heart Health
The key is to use LOADS of flour for dusting and to let the dough rest for an hour BEFORE you roll it through the machine.
Anyone can turn on the radio and snap their fingers to a catchy tune. That's entertainment. People are easily entertained because being entertained is easy. But opera, there is a lot going on in opera. There's the singing, the acting, the story and the orchestral music. There's usually super-titles (translations of the foreign words shown above the stage) as well.
The first of the two Parti-Gyle beers to ferment out, of course, was the small beer. Now, frankly, this beer isn't all that small. With a starting gravity of 1.040, it's going to get to around 4.5% ABV, instead of the sub 3% I was looking for. I guess this makes it an Imperial Table Beer? No. Oh, well.
2. Radiation is staying in the body with more ionic foot baths over time. This isn’t likely since the negative ions absorbed through the ionic foot bath water, is assisting with heavy metal detox flush and the balancing of body pH. Many metals flushed out of the body from ionic foot baths would be the radioactive ones as well.
If you write you’re going to face it. It’s very equal opportunity and I just don’t buy it when people say they don’t have a problem with it. I think it’s natural and sometimes a good thing. If I’m plowing along on something with the sole purpose of trying to fit a certain genre appeal or meet a deadline I may not be doing all I can to let the idea grow and be what it’s supposed to be. That being said, it frustrates me when all I want is to get a manuscript to work. I generally work on a few things at once so I can keep rotating and feel like I’m accomplishing something – I get moody if I get too frustrated and that never gets me anywhere. Sometimes I recognize that I genuinely need to put something away and go for a walk or focus on another area of my life – it’s not a bad thing, it’s a human thing. If I really feel that what’s going on is more me putting something off, then I try to power through. While I know work shopping and having friends beta in-process works help some people, I’m not comfortable presenting something in its infancy until I have a really good grasp of the full spectrum of the idea – otherwise it sounds much more one-dimensional than what I’m intending.
Look at what we're faced with every few days. At least we know a lot of people who are happy to take them off of our hands, it's a reminder of the bounty of summer that is so important to capture and store to spread throughout the year.
who guard me with prayers
So quick was he to wet the lead, so deft
However, several studies published since 2002 suggest that Opioids can stimulate the growth and spread of cancer cells. One study from a group led by Patrick Singleton, PhD, assistant professor of medicine at the University of Chicago Medicine, has shown that lung cancer cells have five to ten times more "opioid receptors" on their surface than do non-cancerous lung cells. Once triggered by opioids that the body produces naturally- endorphines - or by doses of opioids given to relieve pain, these cells then proliferate, migrate and invade at a greater rate.
A love me a pair of tall boots, but out of the six shoes listed, these are the ones I wear the least. I think this is because they are so season specific, and here in Western Australia, our winters are just not very long. Despite that, I still have two pairs, a black flat pair, and a brown suede heeled pair. I love wearing them over the top of skinny jeans or with knee-length skirts. I also think they would look amazing with this season's mid-length skirt, too.
Sometimes, it can get crazy with the mix of alcohol and hormones. Everyone is out to have a good time. Most times, it's a fun event. But there are some trouble makers who like to show off and try to impress people with how cool they are by either doing stupid stunts--like diving off the pier (I actually know a person who broke his neck doing that and became a quadriplegic); starting fights--because they think they're so tough with their friends behind them; or just getting stupid drunk with no designated driver (and I've seen a lot of them get arrested or worse, crash into buildings and other vehicles, causing harm to others). I'd like to think that nothing surprises me now at Spring Break. But I was wrong.
I leave you with images of Racquel Zimmerman and be sure to have a look at some of the fantastic blogs in the links list to the right. Who knows, you might discover something new!
Mind: Fine! Have the damn french fries just shut up already.
Gabor Szabo: While the late, great guitarist Gabor Szabo (1936-82) recorded many studio albums during his brief career, he was always best served by his few live recordings. These two live Impulse albums brilliantly catch Szabo’s working group, featuring the stunning guitarist Jimmy Stewart, in 1967.
Once the front, back and sides are attached, we flipped it over to the add the bottom piece. This was 19 1/2" x 22" and because the plywood was only 1/4" thick, we used 1 1/4" nails. Here's a good spot to check to make sure your box is square. To check for square, measure the distance from one corner to the one diagonally opposite from it (like your making an "X". Then measure the other way (completing the "X"). If it's square, the measurements will be the same. For the perfectionist out there, our box was a little less than 1/16" off (or as I like to refer to as one tick of the tape measure) but it worked just fine and doesn't have to be exactly perfect.
Thank you my dear friend
The top is open on all sides and you look out and get a magnificent view of Osaka. Continuing down, you get to see scenes of Toyotomi’s life, etc, and on the third floor you can pay 300 yen to dress up in either samurai gear or a kimono. About half of the kids opted to try it out, and some of them looked truly ridiculous. A lot of pictures on seoulpictures.tumblr.com. I did not, mostly because I didn’t want to pay for, and they were real kimonos anyway. I had enough fun watching the boys act like morons. OH GOOD STORY. One of the Korean American kids, one of the ones who doesn’t listen and is a huge idiot, bought a shirt that he thought was cool, and to give him credit it was really quite cool. He asked one of the “Japanese speakers” (who took 5 years of Japanese but has forgotten, oh…95% of it) what the kanji said, but of course he didn’t know. I didn’t even know, but I was betting it said something like “bravery,” or “courage” or something. But that didn’t matter, because underneath the kanji it said in English, quite clearly: “Hideyoshi.” Everyone made fun of him, because as a Korean he’s supposed to be hideously offended by this man and also he can’t even wear the shirt in Korea or probably even around his family. To make it all worse, he’d just spent about half an hour listening to a lecture about this guy. Way to go dipshit.
The true situation is even worse than it first appears. Because the original deal, which was brokered by Kirchner's now-deceased husband and predecessor as president, mandated the aggressive ninety per cent dividend policy which was enabling the Eskenazis to pay for their shares, and because the expropriation has seen the Eskenazi who ran the company sidelined (for show) and the dividend policy reversed, the Eskenazis are now *suing* the wronged party Repsol for the payments they were formerly getting.
This graph page shows many of the areas in the world where the Alvah Consciousness is making attempts to enter the third density. Aftrane ships and cats worldwide are on these…
1. Begin with youtube. Just spend a morning searching for Rube Goldberg videos – there are hundreds! And so amazing. Here are a couple of my favorites:
After the meeting, they lowered his flow on his cannula to 1.5 liters of oxygen/min, which he handled just fine. (Less flow means less chances to aspirate) They also pulled the feeding tube back to the stomach again. We were a bit worried that they were making too many changes too fast for him to keep up with. Thursday was a big day, but our boy did well!
"No problem....Joe." she answers with a beaming smile as we prepare to leave the Transporter Room.
Q: How many Hayden Kho Jrs does it take to change a light bulb?
I didn't think such a thing was possible, and I may well find someone who doesn't like it. But if you're trying to share your love of beer with someone who adamently (and honestly) hates beer, give the Duchesse a try.
As such, tensions are high and anger has risen on both sides, making Bersih 3.0 more intense than earlier rallies.
shoes of the notorious Joan Crawford.
This Group will swap charms monthly.
I love the simplicity of this stairway, and the perfect contrast of the dark, rich woods and the bright, crisp whites. I love the collection of framed artwork (something I always have my eye out for), and I would love to find that exact bench and pretty cushions - It's perfect!
Coke. Not diet Coke; the real thing.
Among the more interesting items (in my opinion) up for sale: 20-foot Teepee poles with Teepee liner, Thunderbird Hotel Indian artifacts, handmade Old West grave markers, wooden saddle rack, helmet with horse hair tail and steer horns, very old cactus skeleton and the upper half of a bison skull (8,000 BC) verified by the University of Minnesota/Bell Museum of Natural History.
On Theresa
* "The confusion abou Napoleon's size arose because after his autopsy, it was reported that he measurd five feet two. The problem is, he was measured based on the old French system of pied de roi ... which was shorter than the modern foot." Do the math. If Gregory's facts are correct (hah!), Napoleon would be shorter than 5'2 in modern units.
forth over the spot, singing of you
I do have the plastic lid on this pie but you can see one worm crawling on the top (and 5 squirming in the dirt). These pies sold quite well and people got quite a kick out of them. I keep forgetting to ask Larry what his co-workers thought... The pies are basically a pudding (with whipped cream, cream cheese, and more) poured over a graham cracker crust with a crushed Oreo cookie top.
I'll post the results as they become available. Have a great week!
Wow, I’m really steamed about this.
Also, it’s Kakashi in talking cat form!
Skull&Bones Papal Knights of Eulogia) and worked under Robert Roosa,
Venturing where most do not, I took a chance on a soup that had a 'foreign' sound to it - Fish Ball Soup. It was a wonderful discovery. A light soup base with lots of rice noodles, some cilantro and some pleasantly light balls of fish. Think surimi, but moistened and enriched by a good broth. Light and nourishing, I'll seek this dish out again.
Here is my first download for you. It is a tabbed border with 2 circles to make the topper for the cupcake stand I posted earlier.
and how it’s all so.. fkn.. wrong!
He said that we are all born fully connected with what is important to us, and we are also born with the capability to achieve it. We adults have so much to learn from the perfection of a newborn baby, who comes into the world so pure and innocent, so authentic and vulnerable. We adults are products of lives where we have been disempowered from a young age by not being always honoured, listened to, given what we need etc. In our lives we have experienced stress upon stress, and feel discontent, always searching for that which will fulfil us. This started from the first time we went looking for the nipple to suckle, or woke up alone in a dark room. A child's priority is very simple: to be FREE! (I would also add: to be loved) Free to do, to be and to go wherever they want. Children who have freedom to self-design their life are very focussed, capable, responsible, conscious.... They really don't need much "looking after".
I also wanted to share just a few upcoming ‘events’ in the next few weeks here on the bloggity blog:
